

Yushin Precision Industrial Co., Ltd. South Korea Manufacturers, suppliers





















































Sign in
Join Free

About tradeKorea


Support




FAQ


Contact us


Newsletter Subscribe


TradeAlert


How to Use


Product Listing Policy






Service




News & Notice


Success Stories


KITA Member's Lounge


Online Exhibition


GBMS


Global Partners


KITA ePay Information


Keyword Trends


Korea Trade Statistics






My tradeKorea




Seller


My Inquries


My Products


My Sales


My C/L


My Report


Minisite


Buyer


My Inquries


My Buying Leads


My Order


My Accounts





Cart

국문
中文






MENU


Home
Products
Company Information
Notice Board
      Contact Us       

Send Inquiry
+82-32-819-1541







http://iyushin.tradekorea.com
Yushin Precision Industrial Co., Ltd.
			 
		



























Yushin Precision Industrial Co., Ltd.
Yushin Precision Industrial Co., Ltd.






				
					
					
					    
					    
					    Category Product
					
				
			

Category menu




Category background


Other[0]




No Data








				
					
					
					    Company Profile
					    
					    
					
				
			







Company NameYushin Precision Industrial Co., Ltd.
Business Type
Year Established
-

LocationSouth Korea
Main MarketsCanada,China,U. Kingdom,Italy,U.S.A
Total Employees

												
												101-500 People
											

Homepage

											-	
											
										










Go to KITA.org




Global Business Matching Service


Post Buying Leads


My tradeKorea


How to use tradeKorea







Privacy Policy - 
						Terms of Use - 
						About tradeKorea - 
						
Korean Manufacturers
Copyright ⓒ 2008 - Fri Aug 04 00:35:05 GMT+09:00 2017  KITA (Korea International Trade Association). All rights reserved.


tradeKorea.com is a Global Business to Business (B2B) Online Marketplace that helps facilitate online trade between exporters and importers from around the world.
tradeKorea










Yushin Global Web Site











Yushin Global Web Site
Take-out robot and automation manufacturer for the plastic injection molding industry.






































































APPARATUS FOR TAKING OUT MOLDED PRODUCT - Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 



















Title:


                                    APPARATUS FOR TAKING OUT MOLDED PRODUCT                                




Document Type and Number:

                                United States Patent Application 20170165888                            
Kind Code:
                            

                                A1                            







Abstract:

            An apparatus for taking out a molded product is provided, the apparatus being capable of suppressing displacement vibration of an attachment mounted at a leading end of each of one or more approach frames by active control using one or more electromagnetic actuators. The apparatus includes an active vibration suppressing system. One or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted to the attachment of each approach frame or each approach frame.         










 





Inventors:

                            Watanabe, Fumitake (Kyoto, JP)                
                            Shirasaki, Atsushi (Kyoto, JP)                
                            Kotani, Takayo (Kyoto, JP)                




Application Number:

            15/370026        



Publication Date:

            06/15/2017        



Filing Date:

            12/06/2016        



View Patent Images:

Download PDF 20170165888                 
                  PDF help




Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. (Kyoto, JP)                






International Classes:

B29C45/76; B29C45/42 












Claims:

            1.  An apparatus for taking out a molded product, comprising: a positioning servomechanism using a motor; one or more approach frames controlled by the positioning servomechanism and each having an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof; and an active vibration suppressing system including one or more actuators and configured to perform active control to suppress a displacement vibration of the attachment mounted on each of the one or more approach frames by causing the one or more actuators to apply to the attachment a vibration having an antiphase to the displacement vibration of the attachment, wherein: the one or more actuators are one or more electromagnetic actuators; and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted to the attachment mounted on each of the one or more approach frames or each of the one or more approach frames such that the one or more electromagnetic actuators do not collide with one or more molding dies of a molding machine.                    
                    2.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein the one or more approach frames include a first approach frame having an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof and configured to pick up a molded product from the molding die or to be attached with an insert component to be inserted into the molding die, and a second approach frame having an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof and configured to remove a waste part from the molded product picked up from the molding die by the first approach frame.                    
                    3.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein defining that a Z direction denotes a direction in which one of the one or more approach frames moves into the molding die, a Y direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Z direction, in which the attachment mounted on the one of the one or more approach frames approaches to or retracts from the molded product within the molding die, and an X direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Y and Z directions, the one or more electromagnetic actuators include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress at least the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction.                    
                    4.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein defining that a Z direction denotes a direction in which one of the one or more approach frames moves into the molding die, a Y direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Z direction, in which the attachment mounted on the one of the one or more approach frames approaches to or retracts from the molded product within the molding die, and an X direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Y and Z directions, the one or more electromagnetic actuators include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction and a second electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction.                    
                    5.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein defining that a Z direction denotes a direction in which one of the one or more approach frames moves into the molding die, a Y direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Z direction, in which the attachment mounted on the one of the one or more approach frames approaches to or retracts from the molded product within the molding die, and an X direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Y and Z directions, the one or more electromagnetic actuators include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction, a second electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction, and a third electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Z direction.                    
                    6.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames includes a posture controller provided with a pickup head; and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted on the posture controller.                    
                    7.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames includes a posture controller provided with a pickup head; and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted on the pickup head.                    
                    8.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 6, wherein the posture controller includes a housing and a container portion disposed inside the housing to receive the one or more electromagnetic actuators.                    
                    9.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 6, wherein the one or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted relative to the housing such that the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned outside a bottom surface of the housing of the posture controller when the molded product is picked up from the molding die.                    
                    10.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein one electromagnetic actuator is mounted onto an outer periphery of the leading end of each of the one or more approach frames so as to be positioned in proximity to the attachment.                    
                    11.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames is constituted from a posture controller having a pickup head mounted thereon; a pickup head fixture is attached to an outer side of a housing of the posture controller so as to be rotatable between a first position and a second position; and the pickup head extends along the approach frame and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned below the posture controller when the pickup head fixture is situated in the first position, and the pickup head extends in a direction orthogonal to an extending direction of the approach frame and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned on the side of the posture controller when the pickup head fixture is situated in the second position.                    
                    12.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the active vibration suppressing system performs active control for a period from the time before one of the one or more approach frames uses the attachment to pick up the molded product from the molding die or to place an insert component in the molding die until the molded product is released in a releasing position.                    
                    13.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the motor for the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames is constituted from an AC servomotor; and a transport mechanism of belt-type, rope-type, or carriage-type is provided between the AC servomotor and each approach frame.                    
                    14.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the active vibration suppressing system further comprises: a displacement vibration detecting section operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal proportional to a displacement vibration of the attachment and capable of outputting the displacement vibration detection signal without using a sensor to be inserted into the molding die; an additional vibration detecting section operable to output an additional vibration detection signal proportional to an additional vibration generated by the one or more electromagnetic actuators; and a drive signal generating section operable to generate a drive signal required for active control of the one or more electromagnetic actuators so as to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment mounted on each of the one or more approach frames, based on the displacement vibration detection signal and the additional vibration detection signal.                    
                    15.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 14, wherein: the displacement vibration detecting section is configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a motor current signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal.                    
                    16.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 14, wherein: the displacement vibration detecting section is configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a displacement feedback signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a signal proportional to the displacement feedback signal.                    
                    17.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 14, wherein: the additional vibration detecting section is configured to output the additional vibration detection signal without using a sensor.                    
                    18.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 17, wherein: the additional vibration detecting section is constituted from a coil operable to detect a counter electromotive force caused when an electric power proportional to the drive signal is supplied to the one or more electromagnetic actuators and to output a signal proportional to the detected counter electromotive force as the additional vibration detection signal.                    
                    19.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 14, wherein: the additional vibration detecting section is constituted from an acceleration sensor attached to a mover of each of the one or more electromagnetic actuators and operable to detect an acceleration of the mover.                    
                    20.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 14, wherein: the active vibration suppressing system further comprises a phase shift correcting section operable to correct a phase shift of the displacement vibration detection signal outputted from the displacement vibration detecting section, based on predetermined phase shift information, and to generate a corrected displacement vibration detection signal; and the drive signal generating section is configured to generate the drive signal so as to suppress the displacement vibration of the one or more electromagnetic actuators, based on a displacement vibration frequency component included in the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and having a phase shift corrected and an additional vibration frequency component included in the additional vibration detection signal.                    
                    21.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 20, wherein: the drive signal generating section is configured to adjust a gain of the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and a gain of the additional vibration detection signal, and then to perform computation to reduce or remove an effect due to the additional vibration frequency component generated by the additional vibration of the one or more electromagnetic actuators and included in the displacement vibration frequency component.                    
                    22.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 21, wherein: the additional vibration frequency component is a frequency component of a velocity of the additional vibration.                    
                    23.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 4, further comprising: a displacement sensor operable to detect a lateral displacement vibration as the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames moves toward a releasing position where the molded product is released from the attachment, oscillating in the X direction, the displacement sensor being disposed by the side of the releasing position, wherein the active vibration suppressing system is configured to use the second electromagnetic actuator to suppress the lateral displacement vibration, based on an output from the displacement sensor.                    




Description:

TECHNICAL FIELDThe present invention relates to an apparatus for taking out a molded product that is capable of suppressing a displacement vibration of an attachment mounted on an approach frame in a short time.BACKGROUND ARTJP 2010-111012 A discloses an apparatus for taking out a molded product. The apparatus includes a pickup head (attachment) driven by a drive source to take out a molded product from a molding device, a table to which a vibration component of the pickup head is input, and control means for controlling the moving speed of the pickup head to suppress a displacement vibration of the pickup head by driving a servo motor (drive source) by feedforward control using the table, thereby suppressing the vibration of the pickup head.JP 2004-223798 A discloses a vibration suppressing system for an apparatus for taking out a molded product. The apparatus is operable to control the movement of a chuck (attachment) for holding a molded product between predetermined positions to take out the molded product from a resin molding device. At least one of the chuck and a mover for moving the chuck is provided with a dynamic vibration absorbing device operable to generate vibration for negating the residual vibration of the mover when the movement of the chuck is stopped. The dynamic vibration absorbing device allows the vibration of a fluid sealed in a container such that the fluid can flow therein, and vibrates the fluid and converges the vibration at an attenuation rate according to the viscosity of the fluid.SUMMARY OF INVENTIONTechnical ProblemWith the related art according to JP 2010-111012 A, however, it takes time to suppress the vibration. In addition, it is difficult to set conditions for suppressing the vibration.With the related art according to JP 2004-223798 A, it is necessary to separately prepare a dynamic vibration absorbing device that utilizes the viscosity of the fluid and generates an appropriate resonant vibration according to changes in pickup conditions. Thus, the dynamic vibration absorbing device lacks versatility.It is an object of the present invention to provide an apparatus for taking out a molded product that is capable of suppressing a displacement vibration of an attachment mounted at a leading end of each of one or more approach frames by active control using one or more electromagnetic actuators.Solution to ProblemThe present invention is directed to an apparatus for taking out a molded product, including a positioning servomechanism, one or more approach frames, and an active vibration suppressing system. The positioning servomechanism uses a motor. The one or more approach frames are controlled by the positioning servomechanism, and each have an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof. The active vibration suppressing system includes one or more actuators, and is configured to perform active control to suppress a displacement vibration of the attachment mounted on each of the one of more approach frames by causing the one or more actuators to apply to the attachment a vibration having an antiphase to the displacement vibration of the attachment. The term “attachment” used herein refers to various types of attached parts mounted on the approach frames. The attachment includes a pickup head, a posture controller including a reverse section to which the pickup head is mounted, a chuck device, a cutter device, and so forth. In the present invention, the one or more actuators are one or more electromagnetic actuators. The one or more electromagnetic actuators are mounted to the attachment mounted on each of the one of more approach frames or each of the one or more approach frames such that the one or more electromagnetic actuators do not collide with one or more molding dies disposed inside a molding machine. The magnitude of vibration can be set as desired in the electromagnetic actuators, compared to the dynamic vibration absorbing device. Thus, the active control can be applied to the apparatus for taking out a molded product with high versatility.The one or more approach frames include a first approach frame having an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof and configured to pick up a molded product from the molding die or to be attached with an insert component to be inserted into the molding die, and a second approach frame having an attachment mounted at a leading end thereof and configured to remove a waste part from the molded product picked up from the molding die by the first approach frame. It is not necessary that the one or more approach frames should be inserted in the vertical direction, and the one or more approach frames may also be inserted in an oblique direction or the horizontal direction.Defining that a Z direction denotes a direction in which one of the one or more approach frames moves into the molding die, a Y direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Z direction, in which the attachment mounted on the one of the one or more approach frames approaches to or retracts from the molded product within the molding die, and an X direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Y and Z directions, the one or more electromagnetic actuators include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress at least the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction. This is because, in the apparatus for taking out a molded product, the vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction significantly affects the pickup of the molded product and insertion of the insert component.The one or more electromagnetic actuators may include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction and a second electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction. In particular, the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction significantly affects the positioning accuracy in releasing the molded product at a releasing position and inserting the insert component.The one or more electromagnetic actuators may include a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction, a second electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction, and a third electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Z direction. The active control can be performed at all times if the first to third electromagnetic actuators are provided.If the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames includes a posture controller configured to control a posture of a pickup head, the one or more electromagnetic actuators are preferably mounted on the posture controller. While the posture controller has a built-in mechanism operable to control the posture of the pickup head, it is easy to secure a mounting space for the electromagnetic actuators in the posture controller and the posture controller efficiently transfers the vibration to the pickup head. The posture controller is replaced much less frequently than the pickup head, which significantly reduces the cost to implement the active control. Thus, the posture controller preferably includes a container portion to receive the one or more electromagnetic actuators. The presence of the container portion can prevent unwanted interference of the electromagnetic actuators with surrounding parts.If the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames includes a posture controller provided with a pickup head, the one or more electromagnetic actuators may be mounted on the pickup head. If the electromagnetic actuators are mounted on the pickup head, the vibration can be suppressed most efficiently.Alternatively, the one or more electromagnetic actuators may be mounted relative to the housing of the posture controller such that the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned outside a bottom surface of the housing of the posture controller when the molded product is picked up from the molding die. This allows the electromagnetic actuators to be mounted to the housing of the existing posture controller.If the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames is constituted from a posture controller having a pickup head mounted thereon, a pickup head fixture is preferably attached to an outer side of a housing of the posture controller so as to be rotatable between a first position and a second position. Preferably, the pickup head extends along the approach frame and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned below the posture controller when the pickup head fixture is situated in the first position, and the pickup head extends in a direction orthogonal to an extending direction of the approach frame and the one or more electromagnetic actuators are positioned by the side of the posture controller when the pickup head fixture is situated in the second position. With the use of the pickup head fixture, when the pickup head is situated between the molding dies, the electromagnetic actuators are positioned below the posture controller, and therefore do not collide with the molding dies. When the pickup head is situated outside the molding dies and in the second position, the pickup head is in a posture for releasing the molded product. Also at this time, the displacement vibration of the pickup head can be suppressed by causing the electromagnetic actuators to operate.The one electromagnetic actuator may be mounted onto an outer periphery of the leading end of each of the one or more approach frames so as to be positioned in proximity to the attachment. The leading end of the approach frame usually does not get into a space between the molding dies. Thus, if the one or more electromagnetic actuators are disposed on the outer periphery of the leading end of each approach frame, the vibration for suppressing the displacement vibration can be efficiently applied to the attachment which is located in proximity to the one or more electromagnetic actuators.The active vibration suppressing system preferably performs active control for a period from the time before one of the one or more approach frames uses the attachment to pick up the molded product from the molding die or to place an insert component in the molding die until the molded product is released in a releasing position. This not only increases the speed of pickup of the molded product and insertion of the insert component, but also effectively prevents the molded product from being deformed by the vibration applied before the molded product is cured.The motor for the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames may be constituted from an AC servomotor, and a transport mechanism of belt-type, rope-type, or carriage-type may be provided between the AC servomotor and each approach frame.The active vibration suppressing system further includes a displacement vibration detecting section, an additional vibration detecting section, and a drive signal generating section. The displacement vibration detecting section is operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal (a signal indicative of a detected displacement vibration) proportional to a displacement vibration of the attachment. The additional vibration detecting section is operable to output an additional vibration detection signal (a signal indicative of a detected additional vibration) proportional to an additional vibration generated by the one or more electromagnetic actuators. The drive signal generating section is operable to generate a drive signal required for active control of the one or more electromagnetic actuators so as to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment mounted on each of the one or more approach frames, based on the displacement vibration detection signal and the additional vibration detection signal. In the present invention, the displacement vibration detecting section is capable of outputting the displacement vibration detection signal without using a sensor to be inserted into the molding die. In the present invention, the output from the displacement vibration detecting section is not affected by the temperature of an atmosphere between the molding dies, and thus the active control can be reliably executed. In addition, it is not necessary to insert a sensor into the molding die, and thus the sensor and the molding die do not collide with each other.The displacement vibration detecting section, which does not use a sensor to be disposed in the molding die, may be configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a motor current signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal. In the active control, it is necessary to detect the displacement vibration as a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to displacement vibration of the attachment. The inventors have found that a motor current signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal includes information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment. From this finding, it is found that the displacement vibration detecting section may be configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment, a motor current signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal. If the displacement vibration detecting section detects a motor current signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal and obtains, from such a signal, information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction or the Y direction, it is no longer necessary to provide a sensor around the attachment or the molding die in order to detect a displacement vibration of the attachment. The motor current signal of the motor and the torque signal can be measured at all times. Therefore, according to the present invention, the active control can be performed even when the apparatus operates outside the molding die.The displacement vibration detecting section may be configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a displacement feedback signal of the motor used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the one or more approach frames, or a signal proportional to the displacement feedback signal. This is based on the finding from the study by the inventors that the displacement feedback signal also includes a component varied in proportion to the displacement vibration.If the electromagnetic actuators are inserted into the molding die, or disposed so as to be proximate to the molding die, an additional vibration detection signal proportional to additional vibration generated by the electromagnetic actuators is preferably outputted without using a sensor to achieve a sensorless configuration. Specifically, the additional vibration detecting section may be operable to detect a counter electromotive force caused when an electric power proportional to the drive signal is supplied to the one or more electromagnetic actuators and to output a signal proportional to the detected counter electromotive force as the additional vibration detection signal. Further, the counter electromotive force can be calculated from a voltage applied to a resistor connected in series with an excitation coil, a voltage across both ends of the excitation coil, and an excitation voltage of the excitation coil. The resistor is hardly affected by variations in temperature, which contributes to achieving a sensorless configuration.If the electromagnetic actuators are disposed outside the molding die, the additional vibration detecting section may be constituted from an acceleration sensor attached to a mover of each of the one or more electromagnetic actuators and operable to detect an acceleration of the mover. Besides the acceleration sensor, a strain gauge can also be used as the sensor.The term “displacement vibration” used herein means vibration of the attachment displacement. The displacement vibration includes a plurality of vibration frequency components based on first-order vibration, second-order vibration, and so forth caused by operation of the one or more approach frames and the attachments. Thus, the active vibration suppressing system may further include a phase shift correcting section operable to correct a phase shift of the displacement vibration detection signal outputted from the displacement vibration detecting section, based on predetermined phase shift information, and to generate a corrected displacement vibration detection signal. In this case, the drive signal generating section is preferably configured to generate the drive signal so as to suppress the displacement vibration of the one or more electromagnetic actuators, based on a displacement vibration frequency component included in the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and having a phase shift corrected and an additional vibration frequency component included in the additional vibration detection signal. A phase shift due to various factors such as the configuration of the displacement vibration detecting section is caused between the displacement vibration detection signal and the actual displacement vibration. Once setting is completed for the apparatus for taking out a molded product, the shapes and the weights of the pickup head and the molded product to be taken out will not be varied. Thus, the phase shift can be calculated in advance by prior measurement performed before pickup operation is started. Thus, it is preferable to correct a phase shift of the displacement vibration detection signal based on predetermined phase shift information, to generate a corrected displacement vibration detection signal, and to suppress oscillation based on the phase shift. In many cases, the electromagnetic actuators are mounted on the approach frame or the attachment in order to suppress vibration of the pickup head. The additional vibration detecting section detects additional vibration as caused in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction generated by the actuators, and outputs an additional vibration detection signal including information on an additional vibration frequency component of the additional vibration. If the actuators are caused to operate based on the corrected displacement vibration detection signal to perform vibration suppressing operation, the active control is performed with the additional vibration frequency component of the actuators in the horizontal direction included in the displacement vibration frequency component. If the active control using the actuators is performed with the additional vibration frequency component included in the displacement vibration frequency component, however, it may take time to suppress the displacement vibration, or the vibration suppressing operation may cause oscillation. Thus, the drive signal generating section generates a drive signal required to suppress the vibration of the pickup head as caused in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction so as not to be affected by the additional vibration frequency component, based on the displacement vibration frequency component included in the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and the additional vibration frequency component included in the additional vibration detection signal. As discussed earlier, since additional vibration (additional vibration frequency component) generated due to the vibration of the electromagnetic actuators is included in the displacement vibration frequency component, the vibration cannot be suppressed only with a drive signal generated based only on a detection signal including information on the displacement vibration frequency component. Thus, the drive signal generating section can generate a drive signal, which is not affected by the additional vibration frequency component, by using information on the additional vibration frequency component due to additional vibration of a vibrator for each of the electromagnetic actuators operable to generate vibration for suppressing the vibration of the pickup head as caused in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction, in addition to a detection signal including information on the displacement vibration frequency component.Specifically, the drive signal generating section is configured to adjust a gain of the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and a gain of the additional vibration detection signal, and then to perform computation to reduce or remove an effect due to the additional vibration frequency component generated by the additional vibration of the one or more electromagnetic actuators and included in the displacement vibration frequency component. Gain adjustment enables computation by adjusting the difference in dimension and amplitude between the corrected displacement vibration detection signal and the additional vibration detection signal.According to the consideration by the inventors, the additional vibration frequency component detected by the additional vibration detecting section is preferably a frequency component of a velocity of the additional vibration. This is to prevent oscillation by increasing attenuation of the additional vibration.A displacement sensor may be disposed by the side of the releasing position so as to be operable to detect lateral displacement vibration as the attachment mounted on one of the one or more approach frames moves toward a releasing position where the molded product is released from the attachment, oscillating in the X direction. In this case, the active vibration suppressing system is preferably configured to perform active control in which the second electromagnetic actuator is used to suppress the lateral displacement vibration, based on an output from the displacement sensor.BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF DRAWINGSFIG. 1 illustrates the overall configuration of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to an embodiment of the present invention.FIG. 2 is a block diagram illustrating the configuration of a control section.FIG. 3A is a waveform chart illustrating a vibration waveform representing the vibration of a pickup head during extraction operation as measured by a laser displacement gauge and a torque command waveform for a servomotor in contrast with each other; and FIG. 3B illustrates the proportional relationship between the vibration waveforms indicated by the peak values of the respective vibration waveforms.FIG. 4 illustrates the course of generating a drive signal for an actuator using waveforms.FIG. 5 is a waveform chart illustrating the result of active control in which an output from a laser displacement gauge was utilized as a displacement vibration detection signal and the result of active control according to the embodiment of the present invention.FIG. 6 is a waveform chart illustrating the result of vibration suppression without performing active control and the test result of vibration suppression without performing phase correction, in addition to the results illustrated in FIG. 5.FIGS. 7A and 7B are a perspective view and a sectional view, respectively, of an example of an electromagnetic actuator that can be used in the embodiment.FIG. 8 is a waveform chart that is used to explain that a displacement feedback signal obtained by integrating the feedback speed is proportional to the motor torque.FIG. 9 illustrates an example circuit operable to acquire a signal proportional to a counter electromotive force generated in an excitation coil operable to excite a mover of the electromagnetic actuator.FIG. 10 is a waveform chart illustrating a component waveform of a counter electromotive force as obtained from computation and a waveform of integrated acceleration of an additional system (additional vibration detection signal) detected by an acceleration sensor.FIG. 11 illustrates, together with the waveforms, the configuration and process of generating a drive signal for the electromagnetic actuator using, as the additional vibration detection signal, the component waveform of the counter electromotive force calculated using a voltage outputted from a shunt resistor.FIG. 12 illustrates active control performed to suppress lateral displacement vibration at a releasing position.FIGS. 13A to 13D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a second embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively.FIGS. 14A to 14C are a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment of an embodiment wherein a rotary reverse unit, which is rotatable about a frame line of an approach frame, is used as a posture controller for the attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively.FIGS. 15A to 15D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a third embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively.FIGS. 16A to 16D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a fourth embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively.FIGS. 17A to 17C are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a fifth embodiment of the present invention, and a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, respectively.FIG. 18 illustrates the results of tests conducted to verify the difference caused when the active control was not performed, due to the difference in mounting position of the electromagnetic actuator among the second to fifth embodiments.FIG. 19 illustrates the results of tests conducted to verify the difference caused when the active control was performed, due to the difference in mounting position of the electromagnetic actuator among the second to fifth embodiments.FIGS. 20A to 20C are a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a sixth embodiment of the present invention, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively.FIG. 21 illustrates an example use of the sixth embodiment.FIGS. 22A and 22B illustrate that insert components to be inserted into a molding die are received by a pickup head of the attachment mounted at the leading end of the approach frame and that the insert components are inserted into the molding die, respectively.FIGS. 23A to 23C are a schematic perspective view illustrating an example use in which the state of a molded product taken out by the pickup head of the attachment mounted at the leading end of the approach frame is inspected by a camera inspection unit, and enlarged perspective views of an essential portion as seen from different directions, respectively.FIGS. 24A to 24C are a schematic perspective view illustrating an example use in which a molded product M taken out by the pickup head of the attachment mounted at the leading end of the approach frame is cut off using an external nipper, and enlarged perspective views of an essential portion as seen from different directions, respectively.FIGS. 25A and 25B are a schematic perspective view of a seventh embodiment of the present invention and a perspective view of an essential portion around an attachment, respectively.FIGS. 26A and 26B are schematic perspective views of an eighth embodiment of the present invention as seen from different directions, respectively.FIGS. 27A and 27B are enlarged perspective views of an essential portion of the eighth embodiment of the present invention, respectively.DESCRIPTION OF EMBODIMENTSAn apparatus for taking out a molded product according to embodiments of the present invention will be described in detail below with reference to the accompanying drawings.First Embodiment<Configuration of Apparatus for Taking Out Molded Product>FIG. 1 illustrates the overall configuration of an apparatus 1 for taking out a molded product according to an embodiment of the present invention. The apparatus 1 is a traverse-type apparatus for taking out a molded product. Abase portion of the apparatus 1 is supported by a fixing platen of a molding machine (not illustrated). The apparatus 1 illustrated in FIG. 1 includes a lateral frame 3, a first travelling body 5, an extraction frame 7, a runner approach unit 8, and a molded product-suctioning approach unit 9. The lateral frame 3 has a cantilever beam structure in which the lateral frame 3 extends in the X-frame direction which is horizontal and orthogonal to a longitudinal direction of the molding machine (not illustrated). The first travelling body 5 is supported by the lateral frame 3, and advanced and retracted in the X-frame direction along the lateral frame 3 as driven by a drive source which is an AC servomotor 11 included in a servomechanism. The extraction frame 7 is disposed at the first travelling body 5, and extends in the Y-frame direction which is parallel to the longitudinal direction of the molding machine. The runner approach unit 8 and the molded product-suctioning approach unit 9 are supported by the extraction frame 7 to be movable in the Y direction as driven by a drive source which is an AC servo motor 13 included in the servomechanism.The runner approach unit 8 includes an approach frame 19′ operable to get into a travelling body 17′ in the Z direction. The travelling body 17′ is movably supported by the extraction frame 7. The transfer body 17′ is movable in the Y direction when a belt 15 is rotationally driven by the AC servo motor 13. The approach frame 19′ is advanced in the vertical direction (Z direction) by a drive source 18′. The approach frame 19′ includes a chuck 6 serving as an attachment for holding a runner to be wasted.A travelling body 17 which is included in the molded product-suctioning approach unit 9 is moved in the Y direction on the extraction frame 7 when the belt 15 is rotationally driven by the AC servomotor 13. The molded product-suctioning approach unit 9 includes an approach frame 19, a reverse unit 21, and a pickup head 23. The approach frame 19 is also called “elevation frame”, and is advanced in the vertical direction (Z direction) as driven by a drive source 18. The reverse unit 21 serves as a posture controller to be rotated about a frame line of the approach frame 19. The pickup head 23 is disposed at the reverse unit 21. In the present embodiment, the reverse unit 21 and the pickup head 23 constitute an attachment 24. If the reverse unit 21 is not provided, the pickup head 23 constitutes the attachment 24. In the embodiment, an electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted on the reverse unit 21 of the attachment 24. An acceleration sensor 27 is attached to a mover of the electromagnetic actuator 25. In theory, the mounting position of the electromagnetic actuator 25 is not limited to the attachment 24. It is a matter of course that the electromagnetic actuator 25 may be mounted on the approach frame 19.<Configuration of Active Vibration Suppressing System>The apparatus 1 according to the present embodiment includes an active vibration suppressing system 31 illustrated in FIG. 2 and provided at the control section not illustrated in FIG. 1. The active vibration suppressing system 31 includes a displacement vibration detecting section 33, a phase shift correcting section 34, the electromagnetic actuator 25, an additional vibration detecting section 35, and a drive signal generating section 37. The electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted on the reverse unit 21 to suppress the vibration of the attachment 24 as caused in the horizontal direction. The electromagnetic actuator 25 is operable to apply a vibration to the attachment 24. In particular, the electromagnetic actuator is operable to generate vibration with desired power and at a desired frequency. In the embodiment, an electromagnetic actuator manufactured by Sinfonia Technology Co., Ltd. (product number: RM040-021) is used. In the embodiment, the attachment 24 is constituted from the reverse unit 21 mounted on the approach frame 19 and the pickup head 23 mounted on the reverse unit 21. Therefore, as discussed earlier, the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted to the reverse unit 21. This is because the reverse unit 21 has predetermined rigidity, and therefore can effectively suppress the vibration. In order to suppress the vibration as caused in the horizontal direction (Y direction or X direction), the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted to generate a vibration in the horizontal direction (Y direction or X direction). In order to suppress the vibration as caused in the vertical direction (Z direction), the electromagnetic actuator 25 is attached to generate a vibration in the vertical direction (Z direction).In the embodiment, the displacement vibration detecting section 33 outputs a displacement vibration detection signal S1 including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24 in the horizontal direction (Y direction). The displacement vibration includes a plurality of vibration frequency components based on first-order vibration, second-order vibration, and so forth caused by operation of the approach frame 19 and the attachment 24. The vibration frequency components included in the displacement vibration are varied depending on the structure of a transport mechanism (whether belt-type or carriage-type) provided between the AC servo motor 13 and the approach frame 19. In the embodiment, the displacement vibration detecting section 33 outputs, as the displacement vibration detection signal proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment, a motor current signal of the servomotor 13 used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the approach frame 19 in the horizontal direction (Y direction), or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal. It is necessary that the attachment 24 of the apparatus 1 should be advanced into a space between two molding dies. Therefore, there is a limit to the increase in size of the attachment 24 to which the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted, and there is little room in proximity of the molding die to dispose a sensor operable to detect motions of the attachment 24 to which the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted. For such reasons, even though technicians would have thought that the active control might be effective in suppressing the vibration of the attachment 24, it has not been proposed to suppress the vibration of the pickup head by active control.The inventors, who studied application of the active control to the apparatus for taking out a molded product, has found that a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24 as caused in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction is included in a motor current signal of the motor used in the servomechanism operable to move the approach frames in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction, or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal, and that there is no need to dispose at the attachment 24 a sensor operable to measure the vibration of the attachment 24 as caused in the horizontal direction or the vertical direction or to dispose around the molding die a sensor operable to measure the vibration of the pickup head as caused in the horizontal direction.Thus, in the embodiment, the displacement vibration detecting section 33 detects, as the displacement vibration detection signal S1, a motor current signal of the servomotor 13 used in the servomechanism operable to move the approach frame 19 in the horizontal direction (Y direction), or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal. If information on the displacement vibration frequency component is obtained from the signal S1, it is no longer necessary to dispose around the attachment 24 or the molding die a sensor operable to detect the vibration of the attachment 24 in the horizontal direction (Y direction). As a result, it has become practically possible to apply the active control to the apparatus for taking out a molded product. In the embodiment, in order to actively suppress the vibration of the approach frame 19 in the horizontal direction (Y direction), the displacement vibration detecting section 33 acquires a motor current signal or a torque signal from an output from a motor driving amplifier 12 for the servomotor 13. In order to suppress the vibration of the approach frame 19 as caused in the vertical direction, the electromagnetic actuator 25 may be driven based on a motor current signal or a torque signal acquired from an output from a motor driving amplifier for a motor operable to move the approach frame 19 in the vertical direction. In this case, the mounting position of the electromagnetic actuator 25 may be varied such that the electromagnetic actuator 25 generates vibration in the vertical direction. As discussed later, the attachment 24 may be mounted with a first electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the vibration as caused in the Y direction, a second electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the vibration as caused in the X direction, and a third electromagnetic actuator operable to suppress the vibration as caused in the Z direction.FIG. 3A is a waveform chart illustrating a vibration waveform A representing the vibration of the attachment 24 during extraction operation as measured by a laser displacement gauge available from Keyence Corporation (product name: IL-S100) and a torque command waveform B for the servomotor 13 in contrast with each other. The torque command waveform B was taken from a torque command output terminal of a servo amplifier available from Fuji Electric Co., Ltd. (product name: RYT201D5-LS2-Z25). When the waveform A and the waveform B are compared with each other, it is found that the waveforms A and B are proportional to each other when seen in terms of the peak values of the waveforms although there is a phase shift therebetween. This is illustrated in FIG. 3B. This is confirmed from the result of plotting the absolute values of points on the torque command waveform and the absolute values of outputs from the laser displacement gauge. This relationship is also found to appear for the motor current signal of the motor. When focus is placed on the first peaks and the second peaks of the two waveforms, it is seen that there is a shift (lead) of 0.03 to 0.04 seconds between the two waveforms.The phase shift correcting section 34 corrects a phase shift of the displacement vibration detection signal S1 outputted from the displacement vibration detecting section 33 based on predetermined phase shift information, and generates a corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′. A phase shift due to various factors such as the configuration of the displacement vibration detecting section 33 is caused between the displacement vibration detection signal S1 and the actual displacement vibration. Once setting is completed for the apparatus for taking out a molded product, the shapes and the weights of the attachment 24 and the molded product to be taken out will not be varied. Thus, the phase shift can be calculated in advance by a prior measurement performed before pickup operation is started. Then, in the embodiment, a phase shift of the displacement vibration detection signal S1 is corrected based on predetermined phase shift information to generate a corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ to prevent oscillation based on the phase shift.The additional vibration detecting section 35 detects additional vibration as caused in the horizontal direction (Y direction) generated by the electromagnetic actuator 25, and outputs an additional vibration detection signal S2′ including information on an additional vibration frequency component of the additional vibration. If vibration suppressing operation is performed by causing the electromagnetic actuator 25 to operate using only the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′, an additional vibration frequency component of the electromagnetic actuator 25 in the horizontal direction is included in the displacement vibration frequency component. If the additional vibration frequency component is not taken into consideration, however, the vibration cannot be quickly suppressed using the electromagnetic actuator 25 without causing oscillation. In the embodiment, the additional vibration detecting section 35 is constituted from an acceleration sensor 27 attached to a mover of the electromagnetic actuator 25 and operable to detect an acceleration of the mover. Currently, a semiconductor acceleration sensor, for example, may be used as the acceleration sensor 27. Semiconductor acceleration sensors sized to be attachable to the mover are commercially available. In the embodiment, an acceleration sensor available from Kionix, Inc. (product name: KXR94-2050) is used.The drive signal generating section 37 generates a drive signal required for active control of the electromagnetic actuator 25 so as to suppress the vibration of the attachment 25 as caused in the horizontal direction (Y direction), based on the displacement vibration frequency component included in the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ and the additional vibration frequency component included in the additional vibration detection signal. Only with a drive signal for driving the actuator that is generated based only on the displacement vibration detection signal S1 including information on the displacement vibration frequency component, vibration may not be fully suppressed. This is because the additional vibration (additional vibration frequency component) generated by vibration of the actuator is included in the displacement vibration frequency component. Then, a drive signal Sa is obtained for use by removing the additional vibration detection signal S2′ from the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′. The corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ is obtained by correcting the phase of the detection signal S1 including information on the displacement vibration frequency component. The additional vibration detection signal S2′ is proportional to the speed obtained by integrating an acceleration signal S2 from the acceleration sensor 27 including information on the additional vibration frequency component due to the additional vibration of the vibrator of the electromagnetic actuator 25 operable to generate a vibration for suppressing vibration of the attachment 24 as caused in the horizontal direction. Consequently, it is possible to increase attenuation of the additional vibration to prevent oscillation, thereby making the active control using the electromagnetic actuator 25 more effective. As a result, it is possible to reliably suppress the vibration of the attachment 24 in a short time compared to the related art.FIG. 4 illustrates, together with waveforms, the configuration and process of generating the drive signal Sa for the electromagnetic actuator. As illustrated in FIG. 4, the drive signal generating section 37 includes a first gain adjusting section 37A, a second gain adjusting section 37B, and a computing section 37C. The first gain adjusting section 37A adjusts the gain of the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ outputted from the phase shift correcting section 34. The second gain adjusting section 37B adjusts the gain of the additional vibration detection signal S2′ outputted from the additional vibration detecting section 35. The first gain adjusting section 37A and the second gain adjusting section 37B enable computation by adjusting the difference in dimension and amplitude between the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ and the additional vibration detection signal S2′. The computing section 37C executes computation to remove the additional vibration detection signal S2′, which has been subjected to the gain adjustment, from the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ which has been subjected to the gain adjustment in order to reduce or remove the effect due to the additional vibration frequency component generated by the additional vibration of the actuator and included in the displacement vibration frequency component. If the polarity of the output from the acceleration sensor 27 is negative, the computing section 37C performs an addition.The active vibration suppressing system 31 is preferably operating at all times when the apparatus for taking out a molded product is in operation. With this arrangement, the vibration of the attachment 24 is suppressed at all times. Thus, it is possible to take out a molded product without deforming the molded product, and to prevent the molded product, which has not been completely cured, from being deformed after being taken out by the pickup head. In addition, the molded product can be taken out early and reliably by the attachment 24 if the active vibration suppressing system 31 is operating at least when the attachment 24 is being stopped in the molding die.Further, the active vibration suppressing system 31 may be operating when the attachment 24 is being stopped at a releasing position. With this arrangement, it is possible to prevent the molded product, which has not been completely cured, from being deformed.<Results of Feedback Control>The results of verifying the effect of feedback control in the active vibration suppressing system used in the embodiment will be described below with reference to FIGS. 5 and 6. First, in FIG. 5, X0 indicates the result obtained when the active control is not performed; X1 indicates the result of the active control performed utilizing an output from a laser position sensor as the displacement vibration detection signal; and X2 indicates the result of the active control performed using the torque signal waveform S1 as the displacement vibration detection signal and using the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ obtained by correcting a phase shift (lead) of 0.02 seconds as in the embodiment. The settling time is the time since a target position is reached until the amplitude of vibration of the reverse unit 21 falls within ±0.1 mm. From these results, it was confirmed that the same vibration suppression effect as the effect obtained when the laser displacement gauge was used was obtained in the embodiment.FIG. 6 illustrates the test result X3 of vibration suppression when phase correction was not performed in addition to the results illustrated in FIG. 5. From these test results, it was confirmed that the settling time was reduced to 0.2 seconds or less by performing phase correction.FIGS. 7A and 7B are a perspective view and a sectional view, respectively, of an example electromagnetic actuator 25′ that can be used in the embodiment. In the electromagnetic actuator 25′, a mover 25′B is disposed at the center portion of a tubular stator 25′A, and the mover 25′B is supported on the stator 25′A by three plate springs 25′C. The movable range of the mover 25′B is restricted by stoppers 25′D. The electromagnetic actuator 25′ operates on the same principle as a so-called cylindrical linear motor. The stator 25′A is fixed to the pickup head, and the active control is performed when vibration of the mover 25′B is transmitted to the stator 25′A. The acceleration sensor 27 discussed earlier is attached to the mover 25′B.<Other Examples of Displacement Vibration Detecting Section>The displacement vibration detecting section 33 may be configured to output, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a displacement feedback signal of the servomotor 13 used in the positioning servomechanism operable to move the approach frame 19, or a signal proportional to the displacement feedback signal. The displacement feedback signal is obtained by integrating the “feedback speed” that can be acquired from a commercially available servo amplifier. For example, it is indicated that the “feedback speed” can be outputted in the state display block diagram illustrated on page 14-2 of the user's manual of a servo amplifier available from Fuji Electric Systems Co., Ltd. (trade name: ALPHA5).FIG. 8 is a waveform chart that is used to explain that the displacement feedback signal obtained by integrating the “feedback speed” is proportional to motor torque. The waveforms in FIG. 8 illustrate the “feedback speed” outputted from the servo amplifier (ALPHA5) manufactured by and sold by Fuji Electric Systems Co., Ltd., a displacement feedback signal derived by adding a time lead compensation (40 ms) to the result of integrating the “feedback speed”, and the waveform of the motor torque of the servomotor driven by the servo amplifier. The time lead compensation of 40 ms means that the phase of the integral value is delayed by an amount corresponding to a lead time calculated based on a prior measurement. As is clearly known from FIG. 8, the displacement feedback signal is in phase with the motor torque, and thus the displacement feedback signal can also be used as the displacement vibration detection signal as with the motor torque as discussed earlier.<Other Examples of Additional Vibration Detecting Section>In the embodiment described above, the acceleration sensor 27 is used as the additional vibration detecting section 35. However, the additional vibration detecting section 35 can also be constituted without using an acceleration sensor as with the displacement vibration detecting section 33. That is, the additional vibration detecting section 35 may be configured to detect a signal proportional to a counter electromotive force caused when an electric power proportional to the drive signal is supplied to the electromagnetic actuator, and to output the detected signal proportional to the counter electromotive force as the additional vibration detection signal. FIG. 9 illustrates an example circuit operable to utilize a voltage Es across both ends of a shunt resistor with a resistance value R1 in which current i flows, a voltage Vo applied to a driver DV, and a resistance value Ro of an excitation coil W operable to excite the mover of the electromagnetic actuator 25, in order to acquire a signal proportional to a counter electromotive force Er generated in the excitation coil W. The voltage Es across both ends of the shunt resistor can be represented as Es=R1×i=R1×(Vo−Er)/(Ro+R1)=R1/(Ro+R1)×(Vo−Er)=k(Vo−Er). It should be noted, however, that k is a known proportionality constant represented as k=R1/(Ro+R1). From the above formula, the counter electromotive force Er can be calculated as Er=Vo−Es/k.FIG. 10 is a waveform chart illustrating a component waveform of the counter electromotive force Er obtained from computation and a waveform of integrated acceleration of an additional system (additional vibration detection signal) detected by the acceleration sensor 27. As is known from the chart, the component waveform of the counter electromotive force Er obtained from computation and the waveform of the integrated acceleration (additional vibration detection signal) are in phase with each other. Thus, a signal proportional to the counter electromotive force Er can be used as the additional vibration detection signal.FIG. 11 illustrates, together with the waveforms, the configuration and process of generating a drive signal Sa for the electromagnetic actuator using, as the additional vibration detection signal, the component waveform of the counter electromotive force calculated using the voltage outputted from the shunt resistor. As illustrated in FIG. 11, the drive signal generating section 37 includes a first gain adjusting section 37A, a second gain adjusting section 37B, and a computing section 37C. The first gain adjusting section 37A adjusts the gain of the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ outputted from the phase shift correcting section 34. The second gain adjusting section 37B adjusts the gain of the additional vibration detection signal S2′ outputted from a counter electromotive force computing section 36 constituting the additional vibration detecting section. The counter electromotive force computing section 36 computes a counter electromotive force Er based on the formula Er=Vo−Es/k discussed earlier. The first gain adjusting section 37A and the second gain adjusting section 37B enable computation by adjusting the difference in dimension and amplitude between the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ and the additional vibration detection signal S2′. The computing section 37C executes computation to remove the additional vibration detection signal S2′ which has been subjected to the gain adjustment from the corrected displacement vibration detection signal S1′ which includes the component waveform of the counter electromotive force which has been subjected to the gain adjustment in order to reduce or remove the effect due to the additional vibration frequency component generated by the additional vibration of the actuator and included in the displacement vibration frequency component. If the polarity of the component waveform of the counter electromotive force is negative, the computing section 37C performs an addition.<Operation Period>The active vibration suppressing system 31 preferably performs active control for a period from the time before the approach frame 19 uses the attachment 24 to pick up the molded product from the molding die or to place an insert component in the molding die until the molded product is released in a releasing position. This not only increases the speed of pickup of the molded product and insertion of the insert component, but also effectively prevents the molded product from being deformed by a vibration applied before the molded product is cured.The active vibration suppressing system 31 may be operating when the attachment 24 is being stopped at a releasing position RP as illustrated in FIG. 12. With this arrangement, it is possible to prevent the molded product, which has not been completely cured, from being deformed. A displacement sensor 26 may be disposed by the side of the releasing position so as to be operable to detect the lateral displacement vibration as the attachment 24 mounted on the approach frame 19 moves toward a releasing position RP, oscillating in a lateral direction orthogonal to the horizontal direction and the vertical direction. In this case, the active vibration suppressing system 31 is configured to perform active control with an actuator (not illustrated), which is operable to suppress the lateral displacement vibration based on the output from the displacement sensor 26 mounted to the attachment 24. With this configuration, it is possible to suppress most of the vibration applied to the molded product when the molded product is released.Second EmbodimentFIGS. 13A to 13D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a second embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively. In FIGS. 13A to 13D, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the first embodiment illustrated in FIG. 1 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 1 and the description thereof is omitted. The second embodiment differs from the first embodiment in that the reverse unit 21 serving as the posture controller includes a container portion 21A to receive the electromagnetic actuator 25, and that an acceleration sensor 28 is attached to the reverse unit 21 as a displacement vibration detecting section operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24. A pickup head fixture 22 is attached to the reverse unit 21 so as to be rotatable by 90° between a first position and a second position. The pickup head 23 extends along the approach frame 19 when the pickup head fixture 22 is situated in the first position as illustrated in FIGS. 13A to 13C. The pickup head 23 extends in a direction orthogonal to an extending direction of the approach frame 19 when the pickup head fixture 22 is situated in the second position as illustrated in FIG. 13D. The presence of the container portion 21A in the reverse unit 21 serving as the posture controller can prevent unwanted interference of the electromagnetic actuator 25 with surrounding parts.FIGS. 14A to 14C are a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment 24 of an embodiment in which a rotary reverse unit 21′, which is rotatable about a frame line of an approach frame, is used as a posture controller for the attachment 24, and a perspective view of the attachment 24 which has been deformed, respectively. Also in this example, the rotary reverse unit 21′ includes a container portion 21′A to receive the electromagnetic actuator 25.Third EmbodimentFIGS. 15A to 15D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a third embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively. In FIGS. 15A to 15D, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the first embodiment illustrated in FIG. 1 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 1 and the description thereof is omitted. The third embodiment differs from the first embodiment in that the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted on the pickup head fixture 22 disposed at the reverse unit 21 serving as the posture controller, and that an acceleration sensor 28 is attached to the reverse unit 21 as a displacement vibration detecting section operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to displacement vibration of the attachment 24. The pickup head 23 extends along the approach frame 19 and the electromagnetic actuator 25 is positioned below the posture controller (posture controller) 21 when the pickup head fixture 22 is situated in the first position as illustrated in FIGS. 15A to 15C, and the pickup head 23 extends in a direction orthogonal to an extending direction of the approach frame 19 and the electromagnetic actuator 25 is positioned by the side of the reverse unit (posture controller) 21 when the pickup head fixture 22 is situated in the second position as illustrated in FIG. 15D. With the use of the pickup head fixture 22, when the pickup head 23 is situated between a pair of molding dies, the electromagnetic actuator 25 is positioned below the reverse unit 21, and therefore does not collide with the molding dies. When the pickup head 23 is situated outside the pair of molding dies and in the second position as illustrated in FIG. 15D, the pickup head 23 is in a posture for releasing the molded product. Also at this time, the displacement vibration of the pickup head 23 can be suppressed by causing the electromagnetic actuator 25 to operate to perform active control.Fourth EmbodimentFIGS. 16A to 16D are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a fourth embodiment of the present invention, a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively. In FIGS. 16A to 16D, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the first embodiment illustrated in FIG. 1 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 1 and the description thereof is omitted. The fourth embodiment differs from the first embodiment in that the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted onto an outer periphery of the leading end of the approach frame 19 so as to be positioned in proximity to the attachment 24, and that an acceleration sensor 28 is attached to the reverse unit 21 as a displacement vibration detecting section operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24. The leading end of the approach frame 19 usually does not get into a space between a pair of molding dies. Thus, if the electromagnetic actuator 25 is disposed on the outer periphery of the leading end of the approach frame, the vibration for suppressing the displacement vibration can be efficiently applied to the attachment 24 which is located in proximity to the electromagnetic actuator 25.Fifth EmbodimentFIGS. 17A to 17C are a schematic perspective view of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a fifth embodiment of the present invention, and a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment, respectively. In FIGS. 17A to 17C, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the first embodiment illustrated in FIG. 1 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 1 and the description thereof is omitted. The fifth embodiment differs from the first embodiment in that the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted on a portion of the approach frame 19 located closer to the attachment 24 than to the travelling body 17, and that an acceleration sensor 28 is attached to the reverse unit 21 as a displacement vibration detecting section operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24. Also with this configuration, it is possible to apply the vibration for suppressing displacement vibration to the attachment 24 via the approach frame 19.<Difference in Active Control Due to Difference in Mounting Position of Electromagnetic Actuator>FIGS. 18 and 19 illustrate the results of tests conducted to verify the difference in the active control due to the difference in mounting position of the electromagnetic actuator 25 among the second to fifth embodiments. In these tests, the state of vibration of the actuator during extraction operation was measured using a laser displacement gauge. In FIGS. 18 and 19, data indicated by numerals 2 to 5 are test data for the second to fifth embodiments, respectively. FIG. 18 illustrates attenuation of displacement vibration of the attachment 24 when the active control was not performed. FIG. 19 illustrates attenuation of displacement vibration of the attachment 24 when the active control was performed. As is known from the comparison between FIGS. 18 and 19, the amplitude of the displacement vibration was reduced to ±0.1 mm or less in 0.2 seconds after a target position was reached (0.0 mm) in any of the second to fifth embodiments if the active control was performed.From these test results, it was found that the amplitude of displacement vibration was reduced in any case although initial vibration was larger due to the larger amplitude of the vibration as the electromagnetic actuator was located at a lower position.Sixth EmbodimentFIGS. 20A to 20C are a perspective view and a side view of an essential portion around an attachment of an apparatus for taking out a molded product according to a sixth embodiment of the present invention, and a perspective view of the attachment which has been deformed, respectively. In FIGS. 20A to 20C, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the third embodiment illustrated in FIG. 15 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 15 and the description thereof is omitted. The sixth embodiment differs from the third embodiment in that an L-shaped mount plate 20 fixed to the pickup head 23 is mounted on the pickup head fixture 22 that is rotatable by 90° between the first position and the second position, three electromagnetic actuators 25X, 25Y, and 25Z are mounted on the mount plate 20, and acceleration sensors 27X, 27Y, and 27Z are attached to the three electromagnetic actuators 25X, 25Y, and 25Z, respectively. Defining that a Z direction denotes a direction in which the approach frame 19 moves into the molding die, a Y direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Z direction, in which the attachment mounted on the approach frame approaches to or retracts from the molded product within the molding die, and an X direction denotes a direction orthogonal to the Y and Z directions, the three electromagnetic actuators 25X to 25Z are a first electromagnetic actuator 25Y operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Y direction, a second electromagnetic actuator 25X operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the X direction, and a third electromagnetic actuator 25Z operable to suppress the displacement vibration of the attachment as caused in the Z direction. When the first to third electromagnetic actuators 25X to 25Z are provided, the active control can be performed at all times no matter what route the approach frame 19 is moved along and no matter what position the approach frame 19 is stopped at. FIG. 20C illustrates that the pickup head 23 is placed horizontally.FIG. 21 illustrates an example use of the sixth embodiment. In this example of use, a molded product M taken out by the pickup head 23 is inserted into a product-containing recess R in a pallet P placed at a releasing position. As the product-containing recess R is smaller, the molded product is rubbed more against the inner wall of the product-containing recess R as the pickup head 23 vibrates when the molded product M is inserted. As a result, the surface of the molded product may be scarred, or a part of the molded product may be deformed or damaged in some cases. In the embodiment, vibrations in the X direction, the Y direction, and the Z direction can be suppressed by the active control, and thus the molded product can be inserted into the predetermined product-containing recess R in a short time compared to the related art.FIGS. 22A and 22B illustrate that insert components IW to be inserted into a molding die are received by the pickup head 23 of the attachment 24 mounted at the leading end of the approach frame and that the insert components IW are inserted into the molding die, respectively. The insert components IW are inserted into the molding die, and the molding machine performs insert molding such that the insert components IW are embedded in a molded product. After the molding, the apparatus for taking out a molded product takes out the molded product which has been formed by the insert molding. To take out the insert components IW, as illustrated in FIG. 22A, the insert components IW are received while inserting guide pins GP mounted to the pickup head into positioning pins PP disposed at a part containing portion. To insert the insert components IW into a molding die MD, as illustrated in FIG. 22B, the guide pins GP are inserted into guide holes GH formed in the molding die MD to position the insert components IW at a predetermined position. In such cases, it may take time to take out and insert the insert components IW if the pickup head 23 is vibrating. If the first to third electromagnetic actuators 25X to 25Z are provided as in the embodiment, however, the vibration of the pickup head 23 can be suppressed early by the active control. Thus, it is possible to reduce the time for pickup and insertion of the insert components compared to the related art.FIGS. 23A to 23C are a schematic perspective view illustrating an example use in which the state of the molded product M taken out by the pickup head 23 of the attachment 24 mounted at the leading end of the approach frame is inspected by a camera inspection unit CU, and enlarged perspective views of an essential portion as seen from different directions, respectively. In this example, the camera inspection unit CU includes three actuators AY, AX, and AZ mounted around a leading-end base B of a frame F to which a camera CM is attached. The vibration of the leading-end base B of the frame F as caused in three directions of the frame is suppressed by the active control using the three actuators AY, AX, and AZ. Thus, in this example of use, the molded product can be inspected by capturing the molded product without substantially stopping movement of the approach frame while the molded product is being moved to the releasing position after having been taken out.FIGS. 24A to 24C are a schematic perspective view illustrating an example of use in which the molded product M taken out by the pickup head 23 of the attachment 24 mounted at the leading end of the approach frame is cut off using an external nipper, and enlarged perspective views of an essential portion as seen from different directions, respectively. In this example, an external nipper unit NU is mounted at the leading end of the lateral frame 3 via a support frame SF. The external nipper unit NU includes three actuators AY, AX, and AZ mounted on a frame structure FC to which a nipper is attached. The vibration of the frame structure FC as caused in three directions of the frame is suppressed by the active control using the three actuators AY, AX, and AZ. Thus, according to this example of use, the cutting work can be performed with both vibration of the molded product and vibration of the external nipper unit NU being suppressed when the molded product M is cut off by the nipper of the external nipper unit NU at the releasing position after having been taken out. Thus, it is possible to reduce the cutting work time compared to the related art.Seventh EmbodimentFIGS. 25A and 25B are a schematic perspective view of a seventh embodiment of the present invention and a perspective view of an essential portion around an attachment 24′, respectively. In the embodiment, an electromagnetic actuator 25′ is mounted on another support frame 19′ including a chuck 6 for holding a waste part of a molded product taken out using the approach frame 19 which is used to take out the molded product from the molding die. According to the embodiment, the vibration of the chuck can be suppressed early, thereby facilitating the work using the chuck.Eighth EmbodimentFIGS. 26A and 26B are schematic perspective views of an eighth embodiment of the present invention as seen from different directions. FIGS. 27A and 27B are enlarged perspective views of an essential portion of the eighth embodiment. In FIGS. 26A, 26B, 27A, and 27B, constituent parts that are the same as those of the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the first embodiment illustrated in FIG. 1 are denoted by the same reference numerals as those used in FIG. 1. In the embodiment, the apparatus for taking out a molded product is of a so-called side entry type in which the approach frame 19 is moved in the horizontal direction to advance the attachment 24 into a molding die (not illustrated). The eighth embodiment differs from the first embodiment in that no lateral frame is provided and the approach frame 19 is movably supported by the travelling body 17 movably mounted on the extraction frame 7 and the approach frame 19 is movable in the horizontal direction (Y direction). Also in the embodiment, the electromagnetic actuator 25 is mounted on the pickup head fixture 22 included in the reverse unit 21 of the attachment 24. As in the first embodiment, the displacement vibration detecting section, which is operable to output a displacement vibration detection signal including information on a displacement vibration frequency component proportional to the displacement vibration of the attachment 24, detects, as the displacement vibration detection signal, a motor current signal of the servomotor 13 used in the servomechanism operable to move the approach frame 19 in the horizontal direction (Y direction), or a torque signal of the motor, or a signal proportional to the motor current signal or the torque signal. The displacement vibration of the pickup head 23 can be suppressed by causing the electromagnetic actuator 25 to operate to perform active control also when the approach frame 19 is advanced in the horizontal direction (lateral direction) into the molding die as in the present embodiment.MODIFICATIONIn the sixth embodiment described above, three electromagnetic actuators are mounted to suppress vibration as caused in the X, Y, and Z directions. In the present invention, however, it is not an essential requirement to apply the active control to suppression of vibrations as caused in three directions as long as the active control is adopted to suppress the vibration as caused in a certain direction that affects deformation of the molded product most.INDUSTRIAL APPLICABILITYAccording to the present invention, it is possible to provide an apparatus for taking out a molded product, the apparatus being capable of suppressing a displacement vibration of an attachment mounted at a leading end of each of the one or more approach frames by active control using one or more electromagnetic actuators. 







Previous Patent: Remote Controller for Controlling Apparatus by Diverting Feedback Signal from Native Controller to t...Next Patent: Remote Controller for Controlling Apparatus by Diverting Feedback Signal from Native Controller to t...











Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 























Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. of Kyoto at K 2016 in Düsseldorf -- K Trade Fair



































                    Menu
                
















Login






                                    Search
                                











ENGLISH





Werbung




















            -->
        
    












                close
            


                back
            







                        K PORTAL - Trade fair Plastics and Rubber - K 2019
                         /
                    


                        Companies & Products
                         /
                    

                        
                        Company & Product Search 2016
                        
                    




Advertisement


            -->
        
    

            -->
        
    

            -->
        
    






























Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.



11-260 Kogahonmachi, Fushimi-ku,

        612-8492
Kyoto
Japan


    Telephone +81 75 933-9555
    Fax +81 75 933-9590
kouhou@kyo.ype.co.jp


 http://www.yushin.com
                    









Trade fair planning







0










Remove from MyOrganizer
Add to MyOrganizer



 Recommend exhibitor
                                    






Location




  Hall 12 / B20

  Hall 12 / B20



















Hall map






Fairground map

















Our range of products












Product categories








03  Machinery and equipment for the plastics and rubber industries
03.07  Integrated automation
03.07.003  Handling technology
03.07.003.01  Handling devices





Handling devices

 HSA series
 HST series
 RC series
 YC series





                    4
                        Products
                        










03  Machinery and equipment for the plastics and rubber industries
03.07  Integrated automation
03.07.003  Handling technology
03.07.003.02  Manipulating industrial robots, reprogrammable





Manipulating industrial robots, reprogrammable
















Our products
























 Product category: Handling devices   
HSA series
 

More 
Less 























 Product category: Handling devices   
HST series
 

More 
Less 


















RCII  





 Product category: Handling devices   
RC series
 

More 
Less 























 Product category: Handling devices   
YC series
 

More 
Less 

















About us

















Company details
Yushin Precision Equipment (YPE), based in Kyoto, Japan, is one of the top three suppliers of robots for plastics injection-molding machines in the world.  We provide automation solutions ranging from single, stand-alone robots for sprue picking to complete “lights-out” factory automation systems involving parts removal, secondary processing, inspection, packaging, and material handling.     The English translation of “Yushin” basically means strong reputation, trust, confidence and integrity.  In other words, a company you can believe in.  For over 35 years in business, Yushin has remained true to our name, developing robots with all of our human energy.  Yushin robots feature record-setting speed and unmatched precision, reliability, ease of use, and value.  Our automation and labor-saving technology, installed at thousands of plastics molding facilities around the world, is proof of our success.     Quality determines the fate of the company.  Never forgetting this fact has allowed Yushin to flourish and lead the competitive field of automation for the plastics industry.  Yushin products are made with state-of-the-art equipment and a unique production system based on our advanced technology and accumulated expertise.     The Yushin team welcomes your inquires at sales locations across Asia, Europe, North America, and Oceania.

More 
Less 






Company data
Sales volume
> 100 Mill. US $
Export content
max. 75%
Number of employees
> 500
Foundation
1973
Area of business
Machinery and equipment for the plastics and rubber industries
Target groups

Plastic product manufacturing
Chemical industry
Rubber manufacturing / processing
Packaging / distribution
Vehicle construction / aerospace
Medical technology / precision engineering / optics
Agriculture

























Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd










Manufacturer of take-out robot for plastic injection molding machine.

Global Navigation



 





Contents Navigation

 
















Contents












July 12, 2017

Sales Launch of FRA Series ofHigh-End Take-Out Robot


May 10, 2017

Difference between Forecasts and Actual Results of the Fiscal Year Ended March 31, 2017


May 10, 2017

Consolidated Financial Results for the Fiscal Year Ended March 31, 2017


April 5, 2017

Launch of　CT Series Clamp-End Traverse Type Take-Out Robots


February 3, 2017

Consolidated Financial Results for the Nine Months Ended December 31, 2016


December 5, 2016

Announcing the Opening of Our New Headquarters and Factory

November 4, 2016

Consolidated Financial Results for the Six Months Ended September 30, 2016

August 3, 2016

Consolidated Financial Results for the First Quarter Ended June 30, 2016
 August 3, 2016

Revisions to the Forecast for the Earnings





Click here for past news releases



The plug-in of Adobe Acrobat Reader is necessary to see the PDF file in this site. 








Octobar 19, 2016
Yushin will be participating in the upcoming trade show - K2016.Yushin will be pleased to welcome you at our booth.






Exposition Dates : Wednesday,Octorber 19 through  Wednesday,Octorber 26, 2016




Location : Dusseldorf Fair Ground ( Dusseldorf, Germany )		        
Yushin Precision Equipment co., Ltd. is located in B20 Hall12	        




K2016 Yushin	site          







September 4, 2014

Yushin will be participating in the upcoming trade show - IPF2014.Yushin will be pleased to welcome you at our booth.






Exposition Dates : Thursday,Octorber 28 through  Wednesday,November 1, 2013
		        




Location : Makuhari Messe (Tokyo, Japan )
		          Catalog   English
Japanese 



Yushin Precision Equipment co., Ltd. is located in Hall7,　Booth No.71304



URL http://www.ipfjapan.jp/english/






 

Site Navigation

Inquiry form on WEB
Catalog Request form on WEB
Model list
What is a take-out robot?
IR information
Corporate profile
Press release
















APPARATUS FOR TAKING OUT MOLDED PRODUCT - YUSHIN PRECISION EQUIPMENT CO., LTD.

























































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 

















Title:


                    APPARATUS FOR TAKING OUT MOLDED PRODUCT                





                United States Patent Application 20130004609            

                Kind
                Code:
            

                A1            













Abstract:

            Provided herein is an apparatus for taking out a molded product that can inform a user of the air consumption and the electric power consumption matching the set conditions without using measuring devices and that allows the user to set conditions that reduces the total energy consumption. A consumption computing section computes an air consumption and an electric power consumption per one molding cycle based on conditions set for a plurality of air driven devices and conditions set for a plurality of electric devices input from a controller and individual air consumption information and individual electric power consumption information stored in a consumption information storage section. A display control section causes a display section to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption computed by the consumption computing section.         















Inventors:

                            Jo, Satoshi (Kyoto, JP)                
                            Ito, Hidekazu (Kyoto, JP)                




Application Number:

            13/537159        



Publication Date:

            01/03/2013        



Filing Date:

            06/29/2012        



Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            YUSHIN PRECISION EQUIPMENT CO., LTD. (Kyoto, JP)                




Primary Class:

425/139 




International Classes:

B29C33/44 





View Patent Images:

Download PDF 20130004609                 
                  PDF help




Related US Applications:



20080260888Linear Type Molding Unit for a Container Manufacturing InstallationOctober, 2008Freire-diaz et al.20080041460Fluid distributor and bidirectional drive apparatus for a molding machineFebruary, 2008Schultz et al.20040150131Concrete block surface treatment machineAugust, 2004Grubb20040169699Methods and systems for producing an object through solid freeform fabrication using immiscible fluidsSeptember, 2004Hunter et al.20100009021Mold for making ceramicsJanuary, 2010Liu20100047547METHOD OF MANUFACTURING MAGNETIC SHEET, MAGNETIC SHEET, AND APPARATUS FOR MANUFACTURING MAGNETIC SHEETFebruary, 2010Shimizu20080286398Fast-to-install structure for a threaded rod of an injection molding machineNovember, 2008Wang et al.20090226587APPARATUS AND METHOD FOR ROLLING AND FORMING FOOD DOUGHSeptember, 2009Morikawa et al.20090101276MOLD FOR COMPRESSION MOLDING IN THE PREPARATION OF A UNITIZED MEMBRANE ELECTRODE ASSEMBLYApril, 2009Rule20050093188Binderless preform manufactureMay, 2005Forest et al.20080296800Flyash AggregateDecember, 2008Smith 















Claims:

            What is claimed is:
                1.  An apparatus for taking out a molded product, comprising: a plurality of air driven devices driven by air; a plurality of electric devices driven by electric power; a controller including a display section and configured to set respective operating conditions of the devices of the apparatus; a consumption information storage section configured to store individual air consumption information and individual electric power consumption information, the individual air consumption information being related to a relationship between the condition set for each of the plurality of air driven devices and the amount of air consumed by each of the plurality of air driven devices, and the individual electric power consumption information being related to a relationship between the condition set for each of the plurality of electric devices and the amount of electric power consumed by each of the plurality of electric devices; a consumption computing section configured to compute an air consumption and a electric power consumption per predetermined period based on the conditions set for the plurality of air driven devices and the conditions set for the plurality of electric devices input from the controller and the individual air consumption information and the individual electric power consumption information stored in the consumption information storage section; and a display control section configured to cause the display section to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption computed by the consumption computing section.                    
                    2.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein the predetermined period is one molding cycle.                    
                    3.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the individual electric power consumption information includes electric power consumption information on a motor as the electric device and electric power consumption information on one or more non-motor electric devices; the electric power consumption information on the motor includes at least information on the amount of electric power consumed by the motor when the motor is in an operating state and when the motor is in a stand-by state; and the electric power consumption information on the one or more non-motor electric devices includes information on the amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices when the one or more non-motor electric devices are in an operating state.                    
                    4.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 3, wherein the consumption computing section computes the electric power consumption further in consideration of information obtained from the motor in the operating state.                    
                    5.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 4, wherein: the consumption computing section executes computation upon termination of operation for each cycle; and the display control section causes the display section to continue displaying when a command for display on the display section is given.                    
                    6.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the consumption computing section computes instantaneous electric power during operation of the apparatus in synchronization with the operation of the apparatus; and the display control section causes the display section to display the instantaneous electric power along with the electric power consumption.                    
                    7.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein the consumption information storage section is provided in a distributed manner in the controller and at least one of the plurality of electric devices.                    
                    8.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein the display control section causes the display section to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption at the same time as or separately from each other.                    
                    9.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein: the display section includes a display screen; and the display control section causes the display screen to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption in numerical values and to display the instantaneous electric power in a bar graph.                    
                    10.  The apparatus for taking out a molded product according to claim 1, wherein the consumption information storage section is configured to additionally store individual air consumption information on an air driven device newly added to the apparatus and individual electric power consumption information on an electric device newly added to the apparatus.                    




Description:

TECHNICAL FIELDThe present invention relates to an apparatus for taking out a molded product including a controller.BACKGROUND OF THE INVENTIONIt has recently been desired to reduce electric power consumed by various types of manufacturing apparatuses, including an apparatus for taking out a molded product. Japanese Patent Application Publication No. 2009-292066 (JP 2009-292066 A) discloses a conventional apparatus for taking out a molded product, including a controller that allows selection of one of a power-saving operation mode, in which the electric power consumption is reduced compared to the electric power consumption caused in a standard operation mode determined in advance, and a soft operation mode, in which vibration is reduced compared to the vibration caused in the standard operation mode. The apparatus for taking out a molded product also includes a plurality of air driven devices that suction and take out a molded product, besides electric devices such as motors that directly consume electric power.However, the conventional apparatus for taking out a molded product does not allow a user to check how much electric power consumption has been reduced due to changed set conditions. In addition, the conventional apparatus for taking out a molded product does not allow the user to check the amount of air consumed by the plurality of air driven devices in use. Therefore, the user has not been able to know how to change the set conditions in order to reduce the total amount of energy consumed by the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the molded product to be taken out. If it is attempted to positively reduce the energy consumption, it is necessary to consult with a person who maintains the apparatus for taking out a molded product to determine the set conditions each time the molded product to be taken out is changed. In the conventional apparatus, since the user has not been able to know the amount of consumed air corresponding to the set conditions, a compressor, in particular, must be operated at a capacity more than required if a plurality of apparatuses for taking out a molded product are used in a plant. The total energy consumption can be known by providing measuring devices such as a wattmeter and a flowmeter for each of the apparatuses for taking out a molded product. However, such a configuration is costly and requires the trouble of individually checking the indication of the various types of measuring devices.SUMMARY OF THE INVENTIONAn object of the present invention is to provide an apparatus for taking out a molded product that can inform a user of the air consumption and the electric power consumption corresponding to the set conditions without using measuring devices, and that allows the user himself/herself to set conditions that reduces the total energy consumption.The present invention provides an apparatus for taking out a molded product, including: a plurality of air driven devices driven by air; a plurality of electric devices driven by electric power; and a controller including a display section and configured to set respective operating conditions of the devices of the apparatus. The apparatus according to the present invention further includes a consumption information storage section, a consumption computing section, and a display control section. The consumption information storage section stores individual air consumption information related to a relationship between the condition set for each of the plurality of air driven devices and the amount of air consumed by each of the plurality of air driven devices. The consumption information storage section also stores individual electric power consumption information related to a relationship between the condition set for each of the plurality of electric devices and the amount of electric power consumed by each of the plurality of electric devices. The consumption computing section computes an air consumption and an electric power consumption per predetermined period based on the conditions set for the plurality of air driven devices and the conditions set for the plurality of electric devices input from the controller and the individual air consumption information and the individual electric power consumption information stored in the consumption information storage section. The display control section causes the display section to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption computed by the consumption computing section. This configuration makes it possible to display the air consumption and the electric power consumption corresponding to the condition set for each of the plurality of air driven devices and the plurality of electric devices without measurement by measuring devices. Therefore, according to the present invention, it is possible to inform a user of the air consumption and the electric power consumption per predetermined period corresponding to the set conditions without using measuring devices. Then, the user can be informed, through display on the display section, of the air consumption and the electric power consumption per predetermined period for the conditions set by the user himself/herself to check if the set conditions are appropriate. This consequently allows the user to set conditions that reduces the total energy consumption. The predetermined period may arbitrarily be determined. If the predetermined period is set to one molding cycle, for example, the user can more intuitively check if the set conditions are appropriate. The same effect can be obtained if the predetermined period is set to a unit time.The individual electric power consumption information may include electric power consumption information on a motor as the electric device and electric power consumption information on one or more non-motor electric devices or one or more electric devices other than the motor. In this case, the electric power consumption information on the motor may include at least information on the amount of electric power consumed by the motor when the motor is in an operating state and when the motor is in a stand-by state. The electric power consumption information on the one or more non-motor electric devices may include information on the amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices when the one or more non-motor electric devices are in an operating state. In the apparatus for taking out a molded product, the motor is either in the operating state or in the stand-by state during one cycle of operation, and consumes electric power even when the motor is in the stand-by state. Meanwhile, the one or more non-motor electric devices consume no electric power or substantially no electric power when the one or more non-motor electric devices are not in the operating state (not turned on). Therefore, the electric power consumption per one cycle can be more precisely calculated through computation, even without using measuring devices, based on the electric power consumption information obtained when the motor is in the operating state and when the motor is in the stand-by state and the electric power consumption information obtained when the one or more non-motor electric devices are in the operating state.If the individual electric power consumption information includes electric power consumption information on a motor as the electric device and electric power consumption information on one or more non-motor electric devices, the consumption computing section preferably computes the electric power consumption in consideration of information obtained from the motor in the operating state. This configuration makes it possible to accurately determine whether each of the motor and the non-motor electric devices is in the operating state or in the stand-by state, which enhances the accuracy of computation of the electric power consumption.The consumption computing section preferably executes computation upon termination of operation for each molding cycle. This allows display of more accurate computation air consumption and electric power consumption obtained in consideration of information obtained from the motor in the operating state. Also in this case, the display control section may be configured to cause the display section to continue displaying when a command for display on the display section is given. This configuration allows the air consumption and the electric power consumption, which are displayed according to a change in settings made by the user, to be updated every molding cycle, which allows the user to immediately recognize that the air consumption and the electric power consumption have been reduced or saved.The consumption computing section may compute instantaneous electric power during operation of the apparatus in synchronization with the operation of the apparatus. In this case, the display control section may be configured to cause the display section to display the instantaneous electric power along with the electric power consumption. This configuration allows the instantaneous electric power to be displayed separately from the electric power consumption which is not changed through operation in one cycle. This allows the user to recognize variations in consumed electric power due to changes in state of each of the electric devices (whether in the operating state or in the stand-by state) through operation in one cycle.The consumption information storage section may be provided in the controller. This configuration facilitates signal processing for computation. The consumption information storage section may also be provided in the plurality of electric devices. This configuration allows information collected from the plurality of electric devices to be stored in the consumption information storage section, which facilitates collecting information.The display control section may have the air consumption and the electric power consumption displayed in arbitrary formats. For example, the air consumption and the electric power consumption may be displayed at the same time, or may be displayed separately and alternately. Display of the air consumption and display of the electric power consumption may be switched by an operation made by the user.In a specific example, the display section may include a display screen. The air consumption, the electric power consumption, and the instantaneous electric power may be displayed on the display screen in arbitrary formats. For example, the display control section may have the air consumption and the electric power consumption, which are obtained for operations in one cycle and thus are not changed during one cycle, displayed in numerical values. Meanwhile, the instantaneous electric power, which is fluctuated in real time, is preferably displayed in a bar graph to allow the user to recognize such fluctuations. This configuration allows fluctuations in air consumption and electric power consumption to be displayed in a quantitative manner, and allows fluctuations in instantaneous electric power to be displayed in an intuitive manner, which provides adequate information to a viewer or user.The consumption information storage section may be configured to additionally store individual air consumption information on an air driven device newly added to the apparatus and individual electric power consumption information on an electric device newly added to the apparatus. This configuration allows the air consumption and the electric power consumption to be computed by reflecting the addition of any air driven device or electric device to the apparatus. Therefore, a reduction in computation accuracy due to the addition of the air driven device or the electric device can be prevented.BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE DRAWINGSThese and other objects and many of the attendant advantages of the present invention will readily be appreciated as the same becomes better understood by reference to the following detailed description when considered in connection with the accompanying drawings.FIG. 1 shows the overall configuration of an apparatus for taking out a molded product.FIG. 2 is a block diagram showing an example of the configuration of a main portion of a signal processing circuit built in a main portion and a controller.FIG. 3 is a table showing the relationship among a plurality of air driven devices, drive sources for the plurality of air driven devices, and accessory units for the drive sources.FIG. 4A shows individual air consumption information corresponding to conditions set for the respective air driven devices, and FIG. 4B shows the relationship between cylinders and a vacuum generating device and the amount of air consumed in one molding cycle in a normal mode.FIG. 5 shows information on a plurality of electric devices used in the apparatus for taking out a molded product according to the embodiment.FIG. 6A shows an example of individual electric power consumption information on one or more non-motor electric devices stored in an individual electric power consumption information storage section according to the embodiment, FIG. 6B shows an example of individual electric power consumption information on a motor as an electric device, FIG. 6C shows an example of electric power consumption information corresponding to a speed command for a motor, and FIG. 6D shows an example of the relationship between the speed command for the motor and electric power consumed in an accelerating state or a decelerating state.FIG. 7 shows an example of an image that a display control section causes a display section to display on a display screen based on an air consumption and an electric power consumption computed by a consumption computing section.DESCRIPTION OF THE PREFERRED EMBODIMENTSAn apparatus for taking out a molded product according to an embodiment of the present invention will be described in detail below with reference to the drawings. FIG. 1 shows the overall configuration of an apparatus 1 for taking out a molded product according to the embodiment. The apparatus 1 is a traverse-type apparatus for taking out a molded product. Abase portion of the apparatus 1 is supported by a fixing platen of a molding device (not shown).The apparatus 1 shown in FIG. 1 includes a main apparatus 3 and a controller 5. The controller 5 is communicably connected to the main apparatus 3 via a cable. A touch-panel display screen 7 is provided on the front surface of the controller 5. Various images can be displayed on the display screen 7. An operator can change the settings of the main apparatus 3 and the controller 5 by touching the screen 7. While the main apparatus 3 and the controller 5 are communicably connected to each other via a cable in the embodiment, the main apparatus 3 and the controller 5 may be wirelessly communicably connected to each other.The main apparatus 3 includes a transverse shaft 11, a first transfer body 13, an extraction shaft 15, a molded product-suctioning elevating unit 17, and a runner elevating unit 19. The transverse shaft 11 has a cantilever beam structure in which the transverse shaft 11 extends in the X-axis direction which is horizontal and orthogonal to the longitudinal direction of the molding device (not shown). The first transfer body 13 is supported by the transverse shaft 11 to be advanced and retracted in the X-axis direction by a drive source including a servo motor. The extraction shaft 15 is provided to the first transfer body 13 to extend in the Y-axis direction which is parallel to the longitudinal direction of the molding device.The molded product-suctioning elevating unit 17 includes a second transfer body 17a and an elevating shaft 17b. The second transfer body 17a is supported by the extraction shaft 15 to be advanced and retracted in the Y-axis direction which is parallel to the longitudinal direction by a drive source including an air cylinder device. The elevating shaft 17b is supported by the second transfer body 17a to be elevated and lowered in the Z-axis direction by a drive source including an air cylinder device. A molded product-suctioning head 17c is provided at an end of the elevating shaft 17b, and driven by a drive source including a vacuum generating device to suction a molded product.The runner elevating unit 19 includes a third transfer body 19a and an elevating shaft 19b. The third transfer body 19a is supported by the extraction shaft 15 to be advanced and retracted in the Y-axis direction which is parallel to the longitudinal direction by a drive source including an air cylinder device. The elevating shaft 19b is supported by the third transfer body 19a to be elevated and lowered in the Z-axis direction by a drive source including an air cylinder device. A runner chuck 19c is provided at an end of the elevating shaft 19b, and driven by a drive source formed by an air cylinder device to retain a runner. Operation of the apparatus 1 is known in the art, and therefore is not described herein.FIG. 2 is a block diagram showing an example of the configuration of a main apparatus of a signal processing circuit built in the main apparatus 3 and the controller 5 of the apparatus 1 according to the embodiment of the present invention which is capable of computing the amount of consumed air and the amount of consumed electric power without using measuring devices. The main apparatus 3 includes first to n-th air driven devices 21 which are driven by air and first to m-th electric devices 22 which are driven by electric power. n and m are each a positive integer. As discussed later, the first to n-th air driven devices 21 include the air cylinder devices and the vacuum generating device serving as drive sources for the second transfer body 17a and the elevating shaft 17b of the molded product-suctioning elevating unit 17 and the third transfer body 19a and the elevating shaft 19b of the runner elevating unit 19. As discussed later, the first to m-th electric devices 22 include various types of motors such as the servo motor serving as the drive source for the first transfer body 13 and various types of one or more non-motor electric devices such as switches for valves that actuate the air cylinder devices and the vacuum generating device. A control device 20 controls operation of the first to n-th air driven devices 21 and the first to m-th electric devices 22 according to conditions set through the controller 5.The controller 5 includes at least a display section 29 having the display screen 7 (FIG. 1), a setting section 31, a consumption information storage section 27 constituted from an individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 that stores individual electric power consumption information and an individual air consumption information storage section 25 that stores individual air consumption information, a display control section 33, and a consumption computing section 35. The setting section 31 sets the mode of operation, such as an operation to take out a molded product, including conditions set for the plurality of air driven devices and the plurality of electric devices according to an input from a user. The consumption computing section 35 computes the air consumption and the electric power consumption per one molding cycle each time a take-out operation in one molding cycle is finished, based on at least the settings made through the setting section 31, the individual electric power consumption information stored in the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23, and the individual air consumption information stored in the individual air consumption information storage section 25. The consumption computing section 35 also computes the instantaneous electric power during operation of the apparatus 1 in synchronization with the operation of the apparatus 1. The display control section 33 causes the display section 29 to display on the display screen 7 the air consumption, the electric power consumption, and the instantaneous electric power computed by the consumption computing section 35. The display control section 33 according to the embodiment is configured to continue displaying on the display section 29 when a command for display on the display section 29 is given according to the settings made through the setting section 31.Next, a specific example of computation of the air consumption performed without using measuring devices will be described with reference to FIGS. 3, 4A, and 4B. FIG. 3 is a table showing the relationship among the six air driven devices, drive sources for the six air driven devices, and accessory units for the drive sources, all of which are used in the apparatus 1 according to the embodiment. In the embodiment, as shown in FIG. 3, the second transfer body 17a, the third transfer body 19a, the elevating shaft 17b, the elevating shaft 19b, and the runner chuck 19c, which are driven by air cylinders actuated by valves 1 to 5, respectively, serving as accessory units, and the molded product-suctioning head 17c, which is driven by a vacuum generating device actuated by a valve 6 serving as an accessory unit, are provided as the plurality of air driven devices.FIG. 4A shows an example of the individual air consumption information stored in the individual air consumption information storage section 25 and corresponding to the conditions set for the respective air driven devices. The individual air consumption information includes a value obtained by measuring in advance the amount of air consumed by each of the air driven devices of the apparatus 1 according to the set conditions. Operation of a cylinder is continued once a corresponding valve is turned on. Therefore, the amount of air consumed by each of the cylinders 1 to 5 is indicated in the unit of the amount of air consumed when the corresponding valve is turned on once. In contrast, in order for a vacuum generating device to maintain a state in which a molded product is suctioned to the suctioning head, it is necessary to have the corresponding valve continuously turned on. Therefore, the amount of air consumed by the vacuum generating device is indicated in the unit of the amount of air consumed while the corresponding valve is turned on for one second. In the embodiment, as shown in FIG. 4A, individual air consumption information on air driven devices (an additional air cylinder 6 and an additional vacuum generating device) that maybe added to the apparatus 1 maybe additionally stored in the individual air consumption information storage section 25.FIG. 4B shows an example of the relationship between the cylinders and the vacuum generating device and the amount of air consumed in one molding cycle in the normal mode. In the example shown in FIG. 4B, it is assumed that the runner elevating unit 19 (that is, the cylinders 2, 4, and 5) is not used in the molding cycle for ease of illustration. In the example of FIG. 4B, one molding cycle has 12 seconds, during which the valve 1 for the cylinder 1 is turned on twice, the valve 3 for the cylinder 3 is turned on twice, and the valve 6 for the vacuum generating device is turned on twice, each for three seconds and two seconds. The consumption computing section 35 computes the amount of air consumed by each of the air driven devices in one molding cycle. That is, the consumption computing section 35 computes that the vacuum generating device has consumed 10 liters (=(3 seconds+2 seconds)×2 liters) of air. In addition, the consumption computing section 35 computes that the cylinder 1 has consumed 4 liters (=twice×2 liters) of air and the cylinder 3 has consumed 6 liters (=twice×3 liters) of air in one molding cycle. Then, the consumption computing section 35 computes that 20 liters (=10+4+6) of air has been consumed in the entire molding cycle. The display control section 33 causes the air consumption computed by the consumption computing section 35 to be displayed on the display screen 7. In the embodiment, the air consumption per one minute and the air consumption per one cycle (per predetermined period) are displayed. Therefore, the display screen 7 displays an indication of 100 liters/minute (=20 liters×(60÷12)). In addition, the display screen 7 displays an indication of 20 liters, which is the amount of air consumed in one cycle, as the current air consumption. If the runner elevating unit 19 (that is, the cylinders 2, 4, and 5) is used, or if the additional air cylinder 6 or the additional vacuum generating device is added to the apparatus 1 in use, the amount of air consumed by each of the air driven devices in one molding cycle may be calculated in the same manner as in FIG. 4B to be used for computation.A specific example of computation of the electric power consumption performed without using measuring devices will be described. FIG. 5 shows the plurality of electric devices used in the apparatus 1 according to the embodiment connected to an electric power source. In the embodiment, as shown in FIG. 5, the plurality of electric devices used in the apparatus 1 are divided into motor and one or more non-motor electric devices, and the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 stores electric power consumption information on the motor and electric power consumption information on the one or more non-motor electric devices. The consumption computing section 35 computes the amount of electric power consumed by the motor per one molding cycle and the amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices per one molding cycle to output the total of the respective amounts as electric power consumption information.FIG. 6A shows individual electric power consumption information on the one or more non-motor electric devices stored in the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 according to the embodiment. In the embodiment, the amount of electric power consumed when the apparatus 1 is turned on is defined as “basic electric power consumed when energized”, and the amount of electric power additionally consumed when a backlight for the controller 5 is turned on and the respective amounts of electric power additionally consumed when the valves for the air driven devices are turned on are stored as the individual electric power consumption information on the one or more non-motor electric devices in the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 provided in the controller 5. In the embodiment, individual electric power consumption information on electric devices that can be added to the apparatus 1 can also be additionally stored in the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23. The individual electric power consumption information on each of the electric devices is obtained by measuring in advance the amount of electric power by which the electric power consumption is increased per unit time determined in advance (in the embodiment, per 0.1 second), for example, when the electric device is turned on.The consumption computing section 35 checks whether or not each of the one or more non-motor electric devices is turned on every unit time determined in advance (every 0.1 second). If any of the one or more non-motor electric devices are turned on, the amount of electric power additionally consumed when the one or more non-motor electric devices are turned on is added to the basic electric power consumed when energized (Pbase) to calculate the instantaneous electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices. For example, if the backlight and the valve 3 are turned on, the instantaneous electric power is calculated as Pbase+Pbk+Pv3. The consumption computing section 35 computes the instantaneous electric power every unit time determined in advance through one molding cycle and integrates the computed values of the instantaneous electric power to compute the amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices per one molding cycle.Next, a specific example of computation of the amount of electric power consumed by the motor will be described. FIG. 6B shows an example of an operation pattern of the motor used in the embodiment in one cycle. In the example of FIG. 6B, the motor operates in a pattern sequentially including a first stand-by state, a first accelerating state, a first constant-speed state, a first decelerating state, a second stand-by state, a second accelerating state, a second constant-speed state, a second decelerating state, and a third stand-by state. The operation of the motor is determined by a speed command program for speed and acceleration determined in advance. Thus, the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 according to the embodiment stores electric power consumption information corresponding to a speed command that determines the speed of the motor. FIG. 6C shows an example of the electric power consumption information corresponding to the speed command for the motor. In the first to third stand-by states, the electric power consumption per unit time is not changed, and thus the electric power consumption Pwa in the first to third stand-by states has a fixed value. Likewise, in the first and second constant-speed states, the amount of electric power consumed by the motor per unit time is not changed, and thus the electric power consumption Pnr1 in the first constant-speed state and the electric power consumption Pnr2 in the second constant-speed state have respective fixed values. In the first accelerating state, in contrast, the amount of electric power consumed by the motor is changed by variations in speed of the motor. Likewise, in the first decelerating state, the second accelerating state, and the second decelerating state, the amount of electric power consumed by the motor is changed by variations in speed of the motor. Thus, the electric power consumption Pac1 consumed in the first accelerating state, the electric power consumption Pac2 in the first decelerating state, the electric power consumption Pac3 in the second accelerating state, and the electric power consumption Pac4 in the second decelerating state are fluctuated according to the speed of the motor. The individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 stores the respective electric power consumption corresponding to the speed command for the motor. FIG. 6D shows the relationship between the speed command for the motor and the electric power consumption Pac1 in the first accelerating state as an example of relationship between the speed command for the motor and the electric power consumption in an accelerating state or in a decelerating state.The consumption computing section 35 first resets the integrated electric power value to 0 when one molding cycle is started. Then, the consumption computing section 35 checks in which of the operation states and the stand-by states the motor is, every unit time determined in advance, that is, every 0.1 second. If the motor is in any of the first to third stand-by states, the consumption computing section 35 adds the value of Pwa as the instantaneous amount of consumed electric power (instantaneous electric power) to the integrated electric power value. If the motor is in the first constant-speed state, the consumption computing section 35 adds the value of Pnr1 to the integrated electric power value. If the motor is in the second constant-speed state, the consumption computing section 35 adds the value of Pnr2 to the integrated electric power value.If the motor is in the first accelerating state, the consumption computing section 35 adds a value of the instantaneous amount of consumed electric power (instantaneous electric power) corresponding to the speed of the motor to the integrated electric power value. If the speed is v2, for example, the consumption computing section 35 adds the electric power consumption Pac1-2 to the integrated electric power value. If the motor is in the first decelerating state, the second accelerating state, or the second decelerating state, the consumption computing section 35 adds the electric power consumption Pac2, Pac3, or Pac4 corresponding to the speed of the motor to the integrated electric power value. The consumption computing section 35 computes the instantaneous electric power every unit time determined in advance through one molding cycle and integrates the computed values of the instantaneous electric power to compute the amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices per one molding cycle. In the embodiment, the resulting integrated electric power value is divided by the time of one molding cycle when one molding cycle is completed to compute the amount of electric power consumed by the motor (average electric power consumption).The method of computing the electric power consumption without using measuring devices is not limited to that described above. If electric power consumption information on a motor as the electric device and electric power consumption information on one or more non-motor electric devices are separately stored as individual electric power consumption information as in the embodiment, the consumption computing section 35 preferably computes electric power consumption information in consideration of information obtained from the motor in the operating state (such as actual operation time and information on electric power regeneration). This configuration makes it possible to accurately determine whether each of the motor and the one or more non-motor electric devices are in the operating state or in the stand-by state, which enhances the accuracy of computation of the electric power consumption. In this case, it is a matter of course that a part of the individual electric power consumption information storage section 23 may be constituted from a storage unit provided in a motor drive device.The consumption computing section 35 preferably executes computation upon termination of operation for each molding cycle. This allows display of more accurate computation air consumption and electric power consumption obtained particularly in consideration of information obtained from the motor in the operating state. Also in this case, the display control section 33 may be configured to cause the display section 29 to continue displaying when a command for display on the display section 29 is given. This configuration allows the air consumption and the electric power consumption, which are displayed according to a change in settings made by the user, to be updated every molding cycle, which allows the user to immediately recognize that the air consumption and the electric power consumption have been reduced.The consumption computing section 35 adds the computed amount of electric power consumed by the motor and the computed amount of electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices to compute the amount of electric power consumed by the apparatus 1. In addition, the consumption computing section 35 adds the computed instantaneous electric power consumed by the motor and the computed instantaneous electric power consumed by the one or more non-motor electric devices to compute the instantaneous amount of electric power consumed by the apparatus 1. If an additional air cylinder or an additional motor device is added to the apparatus 1 in use, the amount of electric power consumed by each electric device in one molding cycle may be calculated for addition in the same manner as in FIGS. 5, 6A, and 6B.FIG. 7 shows an example of an image that the display control section 33 causes the display section 29 to display on the display screen 7 based on the air consumption and the electric power consumption computed by the consumption computing section 35. In the example of FIG. 7, the air consumption and the electric power consumption are displayed in numerical values at the same time, and the instantaneous electric power is displayed in a bar graph. The air consumption and the electric power consumption may not necessarily be displayed at the same time.While certain features of the invention have been described with reference to example embodiments, the description is not intended to be construed in a limiting sense. Various modifications of the example embodiments, as well as other embodiments of the invention, which are apparent to persons skilled in the art to which the invention pertains, are deemed to lie within the spirit and scope of the invention. 





 

Previous Patent: INJECTING MOLDING MACHINE FOR METAL COMPONENTNext Patent: DEVICE FOR PRODUCING THREE-DIMENSIONAL MODELS











Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 




















Yushin Automation - Read Our Company Values


































×






















Yushin Automation Limited
Our Company Mission Statement 
To ensure that our clients always benefit from the best automation technology, fully supported by our experience and expertise.Contact Us Today





+44 1527 558 218




To deliver on our promise, we will: 
 
 

Continually strive for maximum efficiency.
Retain an experienced, motivated and well trained staff.
Plan ahead in detail to eradicate potential problems.
React quickly to deal with issues if they arise.
Innovate wherever possible.
Remain honest and transparent in all our dealings.
Work for the benefit of our clients at all times.






Company History
Founded in 2003, Yushin Automation Limited has grown rapidly to serve the UK, Ireland and most of continental Europe. 
Read More










Yushin Network
The extensive Yushin family spreads far and wide across the globe. As a leading manufacturer of production automation robots, Yushin is supported by an equally high quality network of subsidiaries in many locations worldwide.
Read More










Agents & Distributors
In addition to Yushin’s network of subsidiary companies, a number of highly trusted independent specialist agents and distributors also operate in various regions across the globe.

Read More










Careers
Yushin Automation are currently recruiting for the following positions:

Read More











Making the Impossible Possible




























Japan - HQ & Factory - Yushin Automation



























×






















Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd
Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. Founded in 1973 with its office and factory located in Kyoto, Japan.

Yushin developed its first Take-out robot in 1978 for specific use in the plastics industry. In 2008 Yushin celebrated 35 years in the Automation business, and is committed to develop new markets, make product development quicker and expand its global network to meet the ever diverse needs of our customers.
United Kingdom
United States - New York
Thailand
Korea - Kyunggi-Do
Vietnam - Hanoi
Vietnam - Ho Chi Minh
China - Guangzhou
China - Shanghai
China - Tianjin
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Japan - HQ & Factory
Korea - DaeGu-Shui
Malaysia
Philippines
Singapore
Taiwan - Tainan
Taiwan - Taipei















First Name





Last Name




Email

Telephone

Company

Interest
RobotsAutomationEOATSite Visit
Message













				
















Contact Info



Address


11-260  Kogahonmachi  Fushimi-ku  
Kyoto  612-8492 




Telephone
+81 75 933 9555



Fax
+81 75 934 4033



Website
http://www.ype.co.jp/index.html




Location








Making the Impossible Possible

































Yushin Network - Find Your Local Subsidiary


































×























Yushin Network
Find your local Yushin subsidiary here
The extensive Yushin family spreads far and wide across the globe. As a leading manufacturer of production automation robots, Yushin is supported by an equally high quality network of subsidiaries in many locations worldwide.







Location
Representative
Phone
Fax




United Kingdom 
Yushin Automation Ltd. (UK)










United States - New York 
Yushin America Ltd.


Haruki Kimura


+1 401 463 1800


+1 401 463 1820




Thailand 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Thailand) Co. Ltd.


Tomoaki Kiwatani


+66 2 662 2580


+66 2 662 2583




Korea - Kyunggi-Do 
Yushin Korea Co. Ltd.


Motoyuki  Yanagitani


+82 31 433 9655


+82 31 433 9663




Vietnam - Hanoi 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd


Daisuke Iwamoto


+84 43 767 3844


 +84 43 767 3845




Vietnam - Ho Chi Minh 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd.


Daisuke Iwamoto


+84 83 899 0662


+84 83 899 0648




China - Guangzhou 
Guangzhou Yushin Precision Equipment Co. Ltd.


Hideo  Kurokawa


+86 20 8269 0091


+86 20 8269 0001




China - Shanghai 
Yushin Precision Equipment Trading (Shanghai) Co, Ltd.


Yusuke  Omote


+86 21 6440 1586


+86 21 6440 1806




China - Tianjin 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd.


Akihiro  Nakano


+86 22 8823 8713


+86 22 8823 8517




India 
Yushin Precision Equipment (India) Pvt. Ltd.


Masanori  Mochizuki


+91 44 4231 8005


+91 44 4231 8006




Indonesia 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd.


Kazuhiro  Yamashita


+62 21 571 1737


+62 21 571 1763




Ireland 
Yushin Automation Ltd. (UK)










Japan - HQ & Factory 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd




+81 75 933 9555


+81 75 934 4033




Korea - DaeGu-Shui 
Yushin Korea Co. Ltd.


Motoyuki  Yanagitani


+82 53 951 9442


+82 53 951 9443




Malaysia 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Malaysia) Sdn. Bhd.


Toru  Nanao


+60 3 8076 2177


+60 3 8070 6151




Philippines 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Japan) Co. Ltd.


Yasushi  Ichiki


+86 22 8823 8713


+86 22 8823 8517




Singapore 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Singapore) Pte. Ltd.


Takeshi  Iimura


+65 6753 7377


+65 6752 7727




Taiwan - Tainan 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Taiwan) Co. Ltd. 


Fang  Wei-Ming


 +886 6 275 0836


+886 6 275 0836     




Taiwan - Taipei 
Yushin Precision Equipment (Taiwan) Co. Ltd. 


Takahiro  Nakai


+886 2 2585 0507


+886 2 2585 0527










Making the Impossible Possible


























Yushin Precision Equipment Co Ltd
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd

Yushin Precision Equipment 555 exports to Yushin America,inc through the port of New York/newark Area, Newark, New Jersey        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 PING INC.
 CABELA-S HONG KONG LIMITED
 CVS PHARMACY INC
 BOEING SUPPORT SERVICES
 TOSHIBA ELECTROMEX.S.A. DE C.V.    
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd
Yushin Precision Equipment 555 exports to Yushin America,inc through the port of New York/newark Area, Newark, New Jersey


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



YUSHIN PRECISION EQUIPMENT 555
KUZETONOSHIRO-CHO, MINAMI-KU, KYOTO, 601-8205 JAPAN TE 075-933-9555


YUSHIN AMERICA,INC
35 KENNEY DRIVE,CRANSTON, RI 02920,U.S.A TE 401-463-1800



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



NEW K.S.A.I.,INC.
3109 LOMITA BLVD. TORRANCE, CA 90505 U.S.A.



YAI/1033053 NEW YORK
YAI/1033053 NEW YORK
YAI/1033053 NEW YORK
YAI/1033053 NEW YORK
YAI/1033053 NEW YORK
YAI/1033053 NEW YORK





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



MOLU12022471689


MOFU0631583
MOFU0723000
CXDU1596404
MOFU0631583
MOFU0723000
CXDU1596404


Product Description




PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90
PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90
PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90
PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90
PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90
PARTS FOR TAKE-OUT MACHINE HS CODE:8479.90









Bill of LadingJAPTENGO17050426Arrival Date2017-07-17Weight (LB)20,451Weight (KG)9,296UnitsCMQuantity84 PKGContainer Count3CBM85Voyage No.011EPort of LoadingSINGAPOREPort of DischargeNEW YORK/NEWARK AREA, NEWARK, NEW JERSEYVessel NameMOL BELIEFCarrier CodeJAPTCountry Of OriginSingaporePlace Of ReceiptKOBE JAPAN 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Yushin Precision Equipment Co  Ltd
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Union Freight International Logist                                



                                    Amber Jacobson                                



                                    Maria Jean Jacques                                



                                    The Manning Group                                



                                    Byaeagleeyes(hk)technology Co.ltd                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.3637
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X




































Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. - Research and Markets

















































































ABOUT US
BLOG
CONTACT US
FAQ























USD
EUR
GBP



USD 
▼

USD
EUR
GBP






€
EUR
$
USD
£
GBP







+353-1-416-8900REST OF WORLD



1-800-526-8630U.S. (TOLL FREE)








 




Advanced








Price:
€75EUR$92USD£70GBP 
View Pricing






 Home
/






Categories
/






Company Reports











 
SELECT A FORMAT








€75EUR$92USD£70GBP



                                                        Single User
                                                         Electronic (PDF)






                                                                            
                                                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product. The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 

                                                







  ADD TO BASKET




                                                                        order by fax
                                        

                                            need a quote ?
                                        



 

OUR CLIENTS












HAVE A QUESTION?
EMAIL US
VIEW FAQs



RECENTLY VIEWED PRODUCTS











Partner of Research and MarketsVACCINATING 40,000 CHILDREN IN 2017





WHY CHOOSE RESEARCH AND MARKETS?



WORLD'S LARGEST SELECTION




TRUSTED BY THE BEST




CUSTOMER FOCUSED




SAFE & SECURE







I was very pleased with both the customer service and the report itself. Thank you for your assistance.


Andrew Parker
Senior Associate
Covance Market Access Services, Inc.















Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.



ID: 636873
Company Profile
August 2017
68 Pages

Wright Investors Service                                











DESCRIPTION


TABLE OF CONTENTS


SAMPLES



                                                                COMPANIES MENTIONED
                                                            


FORMATS







1 of 5








                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                A textual analysis of the financial results for Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact information, senior officers and Wright Quality Rating analyses is also provided.Quantitative analyses of financial statements (Income Statement, Balance Sheet and Sources of Capital), extensive ratio tables (Accounting, Asset Utilization, Employee Efficiency, Fixed Charges Coverage, Leverage Analysis, Liquidity Analysis, Per-share Data and Profitability Analysis) and proprietary Wright Quality Rating® analyses tables. The Wright Quality Rating measures the liquidity of the stock and the financial strength, profitability and corporate growth characteristics of Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. A textual review of the financial results of Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. versus Freund Corporation, Kimura Chemical Plants Company Limited and Hirano Tecseed Co., Ltd. is includedrepo.   The comparative analysis,of these companies,compares Sales, Company Valuations and Financial Position. Also included for Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. are: Company Description, Recent Stock Performance, Profitability Analysis, Dividend Analysis, and key data items. Additional research for Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd. includes tables with up to 10-years of history of computed ratios, sales, earnings, and security prices. The company’s financial results are compared in a series of reports (i.e. financial statements, sales, key ratios, etc.) to global industry averages.
                                                                            

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




2 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                    Company FundamentalsCompany ProfileComparative Business AnalysisSummary Analysis per ShareSales AnalysisPrice AnalysisEarnings and Dividends AnalysisFinancial Statement AnalysesBalance Sheet - Common SizeBalance Sheet - Year-Year Percent ChangeBalance Sheet - Five-Year AveragesIncome Statement - Common SizeIncome Statement - Year-Year Percent ChangeIncome Statement - Five-Year AveragesSources of CapitalFinancial Ratio AnalysesAccounting RatiosAsset UtilizationEmployee EfficiencyFixed Charges CoverageLeverage AnalysisLiquidity AnalysisPer-Share DataProfitability AnalysisWright Quality Rating AnalysesInvestment AcceptanceFinancial StrengthProfitability and StabilityCorporate Growth

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




3 of 5





LOADING...







4 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                    Japan
                                                                                
Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




5 of 5






Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown








RELATED PRODUCTS 







Y.A.C. Holdings Co., Ltd.


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Nittoku Engineering Co., Ltd.


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Nuflare Technology Inc


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Apic Yamada Corporation


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Kimura Chemical Plants Company Limited


 Company Profile
67 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Towa Corporation


 Company Profile
67 Pages
August 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Yushin Precision Equipment Acquisition Manual


 Mergers and Acquisitions Profiles
August 2017






€22036EUR$25,202USD£19,744GBP







YUSHIN PRECISION EQUIPMENT Company Limited Acquisition Manual


 Mergers and Acquisitions Profiles
August 2017






€22036EUR$25,202USD£19,744GBP







Nissei ASB Machine Co., Ltd.


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Kimura Co., Ltd.


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP








 close

Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.



 close

ASK A QUESTION

*Required Information
 
Product: Yushin Precision Equipment Co., Ltd.


YOUR QUESTION*







YOUR CONTACT DETAILS*

Title
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name




Last Name




Email Address




Country
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




Phone Number



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998












We request your telephone number so we can contact you in the event we have difficulty reaching you via email.
                    We aim to respond to all questions on the same business day.





 



 close

SEND TO A FRIEND

* Required Information
 FRIEND'S DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*




Message to friend




YOUR CONTACT DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*













 


 close

Request a Quote

 
Please complete the below form and click "send request" to obtain a pdf quotation and order form.
This document will be available for immediate download and will also be emailed to you.
            
* Required Information


YOUR ADDRESS

Address 1*




Address 2




Address 3




City*




Postal/ZIP Code




Country*
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State





YOUR DETAILS

Title*
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name*




Last Name*




Organisation*




Email Address*




Phone Number*



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998











                                PO Number
                                (if applicable)







PRODUCT FORMAT




License
Format
Properties
Price




 
SINGLE USER Electronic (PDF)                                                



                                            The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 
                                        

                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product.
                                        

€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







* The price quoted above is only valid for 30 days. Please submit your order within that time frame to avail of this price as all prices are subject to change.





 






















